


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Financial Advisor Resources | OppenheimerFunds






































OppenheimerFunds.com

×





















Spoof Access

















Investor Admin


Advisor Admin




×






OppenheimerFunds.com




United States


Financial Advisor







Select Your Role


Individual Investor


Financial Advisor


Private Client Group


Registered Investment Advisor


Institutional Investor


OFI Retirement Plan Sponsors


Non-U.S. Resident Advisor



CHANGE LOCATION:



United States






Change Your Location




Ireland





Luxembourg





United Kingdom





United States






CHANGE ROLE





×









Oppenheimer Funds


















The Case for International Bonds
International bonds can offer favorable yields and valuations compared with U.S. bonds.







Select Login Type
Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
OFI Retirement Plan Sponsors

Enter User ID


User ID is required

Forgot User ID?


Enter Password


Password is required

Forgot Password?




Remember Me


Log in

Forgot
User ID
or Password? |
Register











News & Insights


















International Equities: Poised to Climb?


A new cycle of international equities outperforming U.S. stocks may have already begun.







View Article




















10 Things to Know About Emerging Market Stocks


We believe there are 10 factors warranting the rotation toward emerging market equities.







View Article




















What's to Worry About? These 3 Things


Despite a seemingly positive equity market outlook, reasons for worry persist.







View Article













Growth Opportunities in a Globalized World
















Searching for the Next Big Investment Idea


Why virtual reality, electric cars and healthcare have Portfolio Manager Frank Jennings’ attention.







View Article



















10 Reasons to Consider Investing in International Equities


Learn how your clients can benefit over the long term by investing internationally.







View Article






















The OppenheimerFunds Global Investing Handbook


Learn the potential benefits of global investing though our Global Handbook. 







View Article












Seeking Income in a Low Rate Environment 

















Complement Your Core with Senior Loans


Adding senior loans to fixed-income portfolios may produce higher yields with lower volatility.








View Article




















3 Potential Benefits of International Bonds


We believe income opportunities for investors may exist beyond the United States’ borders.







View Article












Keeping Clients Buckled In

















Growing Your Business Is an App Away


The CEO Advisor Institute app can help advisors grow and manage their business.







View Article



















Minding the Fiduciary Rule Gap


Our Client Engagement Toolkit helps advisors meet DOL Fiduciary Rule requirements.







View Article



















CEO Advisor Institute Podcast

Download these podcasts to help take your practice to the next level.



Explore












Professional Development







Investment Strategies for a Changing World




Markets may change, but we believe the Right Way to Invest remains constant.






International Growth Fund


Developing Markets Fund


SteelPath MLPs


Senior Floating Rate Fund


Revenue-Weighted ETFs





International Growth Fund
Developing Markets Fund
SteelPath MLPs
Senior Floating Rate Fund
Revenue-Weighted ETFs






International Growth Fund
While the world has changed drastically over the past two decades, Oppenheimer International Growth Fund’s investment philosophy has remained the same: invest in high-quality growth companies at attractive prices and holding them for the long term.


















George R. Evans


Chief Investment Officer, Equities, Portfolio Manager











Meet The Fund Manager


















The Reality of Investing in a Misunderstood Europe











Access Insights











International Equity
International Growth Fund
OIGAX
The Strategy typically invests in a mix of foreign growth stocks.


View More




Compare




Inception
3/96


NAV
$41.36

up
$0.46









Compare Funds





Developing Markets Fund
As China and the Emerging Markets (EM) begin to enter a cyclical recovery, the long-term view has come back into focus: the Emerging Markets are and will continue to be the growth engine for the world. Learn more about the opportunities in EM equities. 


















Justin Leverenz


Director of Emerging Markets Equities, Portfolio Manager











Meet The Fund Manager


















Opportunities and Challenges in Emerging Market Equities











Access Insights











Emerging Markets Equity
Developing Markets Fund
ODMAX
The Strategy typically invests in emerging and developing market stocks. 


View More




Compare




Inception
11/96


NAV
$40.27

up
$0.18









Compare Funds





SteelPath MLP Mutual Funds
Investing for the long term, OFI SteelPath MLP mutual funds are well-positioned to capitalize on current market conditions while seeking to limit risk. Learn more about how to access the fundamentals of the energy renaissance. 


















Brian Watson


Senior Portfolio Manager, Director of Research











Meet The Fund Manager


















July 2017 MLP Update: Market Update, SCOOP/STACK Education











Access Insights










OSPAX

SteelPath MLP Alpha Fund


4










OSPPX

SteelPath MLP Alpha Plus Fund


5










OSPMX

SteelPath MLP Income Fund


4









Compare Funds





Senior Floating Rate Fund
Finding income and avoiding principal losses in a rising rate environment can be challenging, but senior loans may help. Learn why we believe senior loans belong as a dedicated allocation in fixed income portfolios through any market environment.


















Joseph Welsh


Head of Senior Corporate Loan Team











Meet The Fund Manager










The Potential Advantages of Large Senior Loan Funds











Four Reasons to Avoid Passive Loan ETFs










Access Insights











Domestic Debt
Senior Floating Rate Fund
OOSAX
The Strategy typically invests in senior loans.


View More




Compare




Inception
9/99


NAV
$8.14


$0.00









Compare Funds





Revenue-Weighted ETFs
As Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) gain popularity and evolve, Smart Beta strategies that do not weight indexes by market capitalization alone have emerged. Learn why a smart beta strategy weighted by revenue may offer a better way to gain broad exposure to markets. 


















The Smarter Way to Weight the Index











Learn More


















5 Reasons to Consider Revenue-Weighted ETFs











Access Insights










RWL

Large Cap Revenue ETF


7










RDIV

Ultra Dividend Revenue ETF


8










ESGL

ESG Revenue ETF


9


10









See All ETFs











1. 
Special Risks: Foreign investments may be volatile and involve additional expenses and special risks, including currency fluctuations, foreign taxes, regulatory and geopolitical risks. Emerging and developing market investments may be especially volatile. Eurozone investments may be subject to volatility and liquidity issues.  Investments in securities of growth companies may be volatile.  Mid-sized company stock is typically more volatile than that of larger company stock.  It may take a substantial period of time to realize a gain on an investment in a mid-sized company, if any gain is realized at all. Diversification does not guarantee profit or protect against loss.




2. 
As of 4/12/13, the purchase and exchange of Fund shares is restricted, subject to certain exceptions.  Please see the prospectus for further information.


3. 
Special Risks:  Foreign investments may be volatile and involve additional expenses and special risks, including currency fluctuations, foreign taxes, regulatory and geopolitical risks. Emerging and developing market investments may be especially volatile. Eurozone investments may be subject to volatility and liquidity issues.  Investments in securities of growth companies may be volatile.  Mid-sized company stock is typically more volatile than that of larger company stock.  It may take a substantial period of time to realize a gain on an investment in a mid-sized company, if any gain is realized at all. Investing significantly in a particular region, industry, sector or issuer may increase volatility and risk.



4. 
Special Risks: Investing in MLPs involves additional risks as compared to the risks of investing in common stock, including risks related to cash flow, dilution and voting rights. The Fund’s investments are concentrated in the energy infrastructure industry with an emphasis on securities issued by MLPs, which may increase volatility. Energy infrastructure companies are subject to risks specific to the industry such as fluctuations in commodity prices, reduced volumes of natural gas or other energy commodities, environmental hazards, changes in the macroeconomic or the regulatory environment or extreme weather. MLPs may trade less frequently than larger companies due to their smaller capitalizations which may result in erratic price movement or difficulty in buying or selling. Additional management fees and other expenses are associated with investing in MLP funds.

The Fund is subject to certain MLP tax risks. An investment in the Fund does not offer the same tax benefits of a direct investment in an MLP. The Fund is organized as a Subchapter “C” Corporation and is subject to U.S. federal income tax on taxable income at the corporate tax rate (currently as high as 35%) as well as state and local income taxes. The potential tax benefit of investing in MLPs depend on them being treated as partnerships for federal income tax purposes. If the MLP is deemed to be a corporation, its income would be subject to federal taxation at the entity level, reducing the amount of cash available for distribution which could result in a reduction of the fund’s value. MLP funds accrue deferred income taxes for future tax liabilities associated with the portion of MLP distributions considered to be a tax-deferred return of capital and for any net operating gains as well as capital appreciation of its investments. This deferred tax liability is reflected in the daily NAV and as a result a MLP fund's after-tax performance could differ significantly from the underlying assets even if the pre-tax performance is closely tracked.

The Fund is classified as a “non-diversified” fund and may invest a greater portion of its assets in the securities of a single issuer.


5. 
Special Risks: Investing in MLPs involves additional risks as compared to the risks of investing in common stock, including risks related to cash flow, dilution and voting rights. The Fund’s investments are concentrated in the energy infrastructure industry with an emphasis on securities issued by MLPs, which may increase volatility. Energy infrastructure companies are subject to risks specific to the industry such as fluctuations in commodity prices, reduced volumes of natural gas or other energy commodities, environmental hazards, changes in the macroeconomic or the regulatory environment or extreme weather. MLPs may trade less frequently than larger companies due to their smaller capitalizations which may result in erratic price movement or difficulty in buying or selling. Additional management fees and other expenses are associated with investing in MLP funds.

The Fund is subject to certain MLP tax risks. An investment in the Fund does not offer the same tax benefits of a direct investment in an MLP. The Fund is organized as a Subchapter “C” Corporation and is subject to U.S. federal income tax on taxable income at the corporate tax rate (currently as high as 35%) as well as state and local income taxes. The potential tax benefit of investing in MLPs depend on them being treated as partnerships for federal income tax purposes. If the MLP is deemed to be a corporation, its income would be subject to federal taxation at the entity level, reducing the amount of cash available for distribution which could result in a reduction of the fund’s value. MLP funds accrue deferred income taxes for future tax liabilities associated with the portion of MLP distributions considered to be a tax-deferred return of capital and for any net operating gains as well as capital appreciation of its investments. This deferred tax liability is reflected in the daily NAV and as a result a MLP fund's after-tax performance could differ significantly from the underlying assets even if the pre-tax performance is closely tracked.

The Fund is classified as a “non-diversified” fund and may invest a greater portion of its assets in the securities of a single issuer.

To the extent that a Fund obtains leverage through borrowings, there will be the potential for greater gains and the risk of magnified losses.


6. 
Special Risks: Senior loans are typically lower-rated and may be illiquid investments (which may not have a ready market).  The Fund may invest without limit in below-investment-grade securities.  The Fund may invest a variable amount in debt rated below "B." May invest 25% or more of its assets in securities issued by companies in the financial services sector which may be susceptible to economic and regulatory events, and increased volatility.   Foreign investments may be volatile and involve additional expenses and special risks, including currency fluctuations, foreign taxes, regulatory and geopolitical risks.  Fixed income investing entails credit and interest rate risks. When interest rates rise, bond prices generally fall, and the Fund’s share prices can fall. Derivative instruments entail higher volatility and risk of loss compared to traditional stock or bond investments. Leverage (borrowing) involves transaction and interest costs on amounts borrowed, which may reduce performance.


7. 
Special Risks: An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of principal amount invested. Fund returns may not match the return of its respective index, known as non-correlation risk, due to operating expenses incurred by the Fund. The alternate weighting approach employed by the Fund (i.e., using revenues as a weighting measure), while designed to enhance potential returns, may not produce the desired results. Because the Fund is rebalanced quarterly, portfolio turnover may exceed 100%. The greater the portfolio turnover, the greater the transaction costs, which could have an adverse effect on Fund performance.


8. 
Special Risks: An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of principal amount invested. There is no guarantee that the issuers of stocks will declare dividends in the future, or that dividends will remain at their current levels or increase over time. The Fund is classified as a “non-diversified” fund and may invest a greater portion of its assets in the securities of a single issuer. Investing significantly in a particular region, industry, sector or issuer may increase volatility and risk. Fund returns may not match the return of its respective index, known as non-correlation risk, due to operating expenses incurred by the Fund. The alternate weighting approach employed by the Fund (i.e., using revenues as a weighting measure), while designed to enhance potential returns, may not produce the desired results. Because the Fund is rebalanced quarterly, portfolio turnover may exceed 100%. The greater the portfolio turnover, the greater the transaction costs, which could have an adverse effect on Fund performance.


9. 
This is a new fund with a limited history and an inception date of 10/28/16.


10. 
Special Risks: An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of principal amount invested. The stocks of companies with favorable ESG practices may underperform the stock market as a whole. Fund returns may not match the return of its respective index, known as non-correlation risk, due to operating expenses incurred by the Fund. The alternate weighting approach employed by the Fund (i.e., using revenues as a weighting measure), while designed to enhance potential returns, may not produce the desired results. Because the Fund is rebalanced quarterly, portfolio turnover may exceed 100%. The greater the portfolio turnover, the greater the transaction costs, which could have an adverse effect on Fund performance.


A. 
Daily net asset value and dollar change of the fund is as of the previous business day's closing. Fund net asset values are updated at approximately 7:00pm ET daily.
↩












You are leaving www.oppenheimerfunds.com and being redirected to a new site.


OppenheimerFunds, Inc. is not responsible for the content of any such site, and does not endorse or approve of that content.

Continue


×



Enlarged Image Modal


×









Loading...


Tiny Button
Small Button
Large Button
Default Button
Secondary Button
Framed Button
Framed Button ( Small Caps )








﻿





























MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (MWA) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research to Sell - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (MWA) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research to Sell
Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) Analysts Give Nordex SE (ETR:NDX1) a €12.00 Price Target
SAP SE (ETR:SAP) PT Set at €108.00 by Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)
Scotiabank Reaffirms Hold Rating for Holly Energy Partners, L.P. (HEP)
WNS (Holdings) Limited (WNS) Price Target Raised to $40.00 at Citigroup Inc.
Zendesk, Inc. (ZEN) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Stifel Nicolaus
Fiserv (NASDAQ:FISV) Given Coverage Optimism Rating of 0.42
8point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD) Stock Rating Lowered by Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.
Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage Somewhat Likely to Impact Ventas (VTR) Stock Price
Invesco PLC (IVZ) PT Raised to $40.00 at Jefferies Group LLC
Piedmont Investment Advisors LLC Purchases 1,108 Shares of HCA Holdings, Inc. (NYSE:HCA)
MB Financial Inc. (MBFI) Expected to Post Earnings of $0.64 Per Share
Analyzing Pep Boys – Manny Moe & Jack (PBY) & AutoZone (NYSE:AZO)
CommerceHub, Inc. (CHUBA) Rating Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research
Summit Financial Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:SMMF) Scheduled to Post Earnings on Monday
Videocon d2h Limited (VDTH) Set to Announce Earnings on Monday
Western Gas Partners, LP (NYSE:WES) Scheduled to Post Quarterly Earnings on Monday
Zacks Investment Research Downgrades Ceragon Networks Ltd. (CRNT) to Hold
Ampco-Pittsburgh Corporation (AP) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Research
Marquee Energy Ltd (MQX) Director Acquires C$11,200.00 in Stock







MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (MWA) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research to Sell


					Posted by Harper Lund on Jul 23rd, 2017 // No Comments




MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (NYSE:MWA) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a research note issued to investors on Friday. 
According to Zacks, “Mueller Water Products, Inc. manufactures and markets products and services that are used in the transmission and distribution of safe, clean drinking water and in water treatment facilities. Their broad product portfolio includes engineered valves, fire hydrants, pipe fittings, water meters and ductile iron pipe, which are used by municipalities, as well as the residential and non-residential construction industries.   “


 Get MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS alerts:



Several other brokerages have also issued reports on MWA. Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.  reiterated an “outperform” rating and issued a $15.00 price target on shares of MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS in a research note on Thursday, March 23rd. Nomura assumed coverage on shares of MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS in a research note on Wednesday, April 12th. They issued a “buy” rating and a $15.00 price target on the stock. CIBC  reiterated an “outperform” rating and issued a $15.00 price target on shares of MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS in a research note on Friday, March 24th. Finally, BidaskClub upgraded shares of MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a research note on Friday, June 30th. One investment analyst  has rated the stock with a sell rating, two have assigned  a hold rating and six have assigned  a buy rating to the company. MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS presently has a consensus rating of “Buy” and an average target price of $13.71.





Shares of MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (NYSE:MWA) opened at 11.50 on Friday. The company has a market capitalization of $1.83 billion, a PE ratio of 15.52 and a beta of 1.38. The company has a 50-day moving average of $11.43 and a 200-day moving average of $12.03. MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS has a one year low of $10.45 and a one year high of $14.20. 
MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (NYSE:MWA) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, April 27th. The industrial products company reported $0.09 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, meeting the consensus estimate of $0.09. MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS had a net margin of 12.45% and a return on equity of 18.45%. The firm had revenue of $199.70 million for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $206 million. During the same period in the previous year, the business earned $0.10 EPS. The company’s revenue was up 1.3% compared to the same quarter last year.  On average, analysts anticipate that  MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS will post $0.45 earnings per share for the current year. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: This report was originally  posted by Chaffey Breeze and is the sole property of of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this report on another domain, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of US & international copyright & trademark law. The correct version of this report can be accessed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/23/mueller-water-products-mwa-downgraded-by-zacks-investment-research-to-sell.html. 
In other news, Director Shirley C. Franklin sold 9,156 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction dated Wednesday, June 14th. The shares were sold at an average price of $11.40, for a total transaction of $104,378.40. Following the transaction, the director now directly owns 39,157 shares in the company, valued at approximately $446,389.80. The transaction was disclosed in a document filed with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through the SEC website. Also, Director Bernard G. Rethore sold 56,400 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction dated Tuesday, May 30th. The stock was sold at an average price of $11.23, for a total transaction of $633,372.00. Following the transaction, the director now owns 27,303 shares in the company, valued at $306,612.69. The disclosure for this sale can be found here. 4.30% of the stock is owned by insiders. 
Hedge funds and other institutional investors have recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. BlackRock Inc. raised its position in  MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS by 14,036.8% in the first quarter. BlackRock Inc. now owns 13,522,561 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $159,837,000 after buying an additional 13,426,906 shares in the last quarter.  Gamco Investors INC. ET AL raised its position in  MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS by 273.5% in the first quarter. Gamco Investors INC. ET AL now owns 5,103,980 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $60,329,000 after buying an additional 3,737,574 shares in the last quarter.  Vanguard Group Inc. raised its position in  MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS by 8.8% in the first quarter. Vanguard Group Inc. now owns 12,650,343 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $149,528,000 after buying an additional 1,017,949 shares in the last quarter.  Bank of America Corp DE raised its position in  MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS by 110.5% in the first quarter. Bank of America Corp DE now owns 1,603,860 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $18,958,000 after buying an additional 842,053 shares in the last quarter.  Finally, Impax Asset Management LTD raised its position in  MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS by 31.1% in the first quarter. Impax Asset Management LTD now owns 3,411,887 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $40,329,000 after buying an additional 809,000 shares in the last quarter. Institutional investors own  87.36% of the company’s stock. 
About MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS
Mueller Water Products, Inc is a manufacturer and marketer of products and services used in the transmission, distribution and measurement of water in North America. The Company operates through three segments: Mueller Co, Anvil and Mueller Technologies. The Mueller Co segment manufactures valves for water and gas systems, and dry-barrel and wet-barrel fire hydrants.
Get a free copy of the Zacks research report on MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS (MWA)
For more information about research offerings from Zacks Investment Research, visit Zacks.com







Receive News & Ratings for MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for MUELLER WATER PRODUCTS and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 













































Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 27, 2017 11:58 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. provides middle-market investment banking and full service broker-dealer products and services. The company offers full-service brokerage services covering exchange-traded and over-the-counter corporate equity and debt securities, money market instruments, exchange-traded options and futures contracts, municipal bonds, mutual funds, and unit investment trusts; financial and wealth planning services; and margin lending services. It also provides asset management services, including separately managed accounts, mutual fund managed accounts, discretionary portfolio management programs, fee-based non-discretionary investment advisory services, alternative investments, p...
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. provides middle-market investment banking and full service broker-dealer products and services. The company offers full-service brokerage services covering exchange-traded and over-the-counter corporate equity and debt securities, money market instruments, exchange-traded options and futures contracts, municipal bonds, mutual funds, and unit investment trusts; financial and wealth planning services; and margin lending services. It also provides asset management services, including separately managed accounts, mutual fund managed accounts, discretionary portfolio management programs, fee-based non-discretionary investment advisory services, alternative investments, portfolio enhancement programs, investment advisory services, and institutional taxable fixed income portfolio management services. In addition, the company offers investment banking services, including strategic advisory services and capital markets products; and institutional equity sales and trading, equity research, equity derivatives and index options, convertible bonds, and event driven sales and trading services. Further, it provides fixed income sales and trading, fixed income research, public finance, and municipal trading services; offers securities lending services; and engages in equities, fixed income, and proprietary trading and investment activities. Additionally, the company offers underwriting, market-making, and trust services; and is involved in originating and servicing Federal Housing Administration insured multifamily and healthcare facility loans, as well as securitizing these loans into Ginnie Mae mortgage backed securities. It serves high-net-worth individuals and families, corporate executives, small and mid-sized businesses, institutions and investment advisers, financial sponsors, and domestic and international investors in the Americas, Europe, the Middle East, and Asia. The company was founded in 1881 and is headquartered in New York, New York.
Detailed Description


85 Broad StreetNew York, NY 10004United StatesFounded in 18813,039 Employees



Phone: 212-668-8000

www.opco.com







Key Executives for Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.




Mr. Albert Grinsfelder Lowenthal


      	Chairman & CEO
      


Age: 71
        

Total Annual Compensation: $500.0K








Mr. Jeffrey J. Alfano


      	Chief Financial Officer and Principal Financial & Accounting Officer
      


Age: 47
        

Total Annual Compensation: $775.0K








Mr. Bryan Edward McKigney


      	President of Oppenheimer Asset Management Inc
      


Age: 58
        

Total Annual Compensation: $825.0K








Mr. Dennis Patrick McNamara Esq.


      	Secretary
      


Total Annual Compensation: $760.0K








Mr. M. Whaley


      	Executive Vice President of Private Client Services - Oppenheimer & Co Inc
      


Total Annual Compensation: $693.8K





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2016. 

Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Key Developments

Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Issues $200,000,000 Aggregate Principal Amount of 6.75% Senior Secured Notes Due 2022
Jun 23 17
On June 23, 2017, Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. issued $200,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 6.75% Senior Secured Notes due 2022 under an indenture, dated as of June 23, 2017, among the Company, the Company's subsidiaries, E.A. Viner International Co. and Viner Finance Inc., and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee and as collateral agent. The Notes were issued in a private offering exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, to qualified institutional buyers in accordance with Rule 144A and to persons outside of the United States pursuant to Regulation S under the Securities Act. The Company used a portion of the net proceeds from the offering of the Notes to redeem in full its 8.75% Senior Secured Notes due April 15, 2018 (the 8.75% Notes), and pay all related fees and expenses in relation thereto. The remaining net proceeds from the offering are expected to be used for general corporate purposes, which may include acquisitions of or investments in other businesses that the Company believes will complement its current businesses. The Notes are guaranteed on a senior secured basis by the Subsidiary Guarantors. The Notes are secured by a first-priority security interest in substantially all of the Company's and the Subsidiary Guarantors' existing and future tangible and intangible assets, subject to certain exceptions and permitted liens. The Notes are senior secured obligations of the Company and will mature on July 1, 2022. The Notes bear interest at a rate of 6.75% per annum, payable semiannually to holders of record at the close of business on December 15 and June 15 immediately preceding the interest payment date on January 1 and July 1, respectively, of each year.


Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering
Jun 16 17
On June 16, 2017, Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. and the Company's subsidiaries, E.A. Viner International Co. and Viner Finance Inc. (together, the Subsidiary Guarantors), entered into a Purchase Agreement (the Purchase Agreement) with the initial purchaser named therein, an affiliate of the Company, relating to the sale by the Company of $200 million aggregate principal amount of the Company's 6.75% Senior Secured Notes due 2022 at an issue price of 100% (the Notes). The Notes will be issued in a private offering that is exempt from the registration requirements of the Securities Act of 1933 (the Securities Act). The notes will be offered in the United States only to qualified institutional buyers under Rule 144A of the Securities Act and outside the United States under Regulation S of the Securities Act. The Notes will be guaranteed on a senior secured basis by the Subsidiary Guarantors. The Notes will be secured by a first-priority security interest in substantially all of the Company's and the Subsidiary Guarantors' existing and future tangible and intangible assets. Subject to customary closing conditions, the sale of the Notes is expected to close on or about June 23, 2017.


Oppenheimer Holdings Mulls Acquisitions 
Jun 16 17
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. (NYSE:OPY) is seeking acquisitions. Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. announced that it priced $200 million aggregate principal amount of 6.75% senior secured notes due 2022. OPY intends to use a portion of the net proceeds from the offering of the Notes to redeem in full its 8.75% Senior Secured Notes due April 15, 2018, and pay all related fees and expenses in relation thereto. The remaining net proceeds from the offering will be used for general corporate purposes, which may include acquisitions of or investments in other businesses that OPY believes will complement its current businesses.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Buyback

			      May 5, 2017
			    
--



Merger/Acquisition

			      July 29, 2016
			    
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc., Business Pipeline Of Mortgage Loans





Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Oppenheimer Holdings Inc., please visit www.opco.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close































Welcome to Oppenheimer & Co. Inc.














































IN OUR VIEW FOR THE WEEK OF July 24, 2017





Investment Strategy "Give Me Money That’s What I Want"John Stoltzfus, Chief Investment Strategist
We quote the Beatles on the effects of currency trends on the performance of international assets.






Investor Update Newsletter   Read the latest edition of a free Oppenheimer newsletter made for you. It covers topics that are likely on your mind and it provides some useful tips. July 2017 Edition 










Oppenheimer can help you with your financial needs








Market Observations by Jeff Sutton








Conferences and Events 




















  OPY:New York Stock Quote - Oppenheimer Holdings Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Oppenheimer Holdings Inc   OPY:US   New York        16.60USD   0.00   0.00%     As of 11:39 AM EDT 7/27/2017     Open   16.70    Day Range   16.40 - 16.75    Volume   9,304    Previous Close   16.60    52Wk Range   13.65 - 19.65    1 Yr Return   7.96%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   16.70    Day Range   16.40 - 16.75    Volume   9,304    Previous Close   16.60    52Wk Range   13.65 - 19.65    1 Yr Return   7.96%    YTD Return   -10.75%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -1.05    Market Cap (m USD)   219.755    Shares Outstanding  (m)   13.179    Price/Sales (TTM)   0.26    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   2.66%        Sector Financials   % Price Change -0.19%     Industry Diversified Financials   % Price Change -0.55%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     7/25/2017   Guggenheim Securities Hires Sean Sneeden as Energy Sector Credit Strategist     7/3/2017   Bloomberg Americas Capital Markets League Tables H1 2017     7/3/2017   Bloomberg US Municipals League Tables H1 2017     6/29/2017   Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Four New Managing Directors In Its Fixed Income Business     6/28/2017   Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Adds Two Managing Directors in Key Growth Markets     6/22/2017   Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Completes 17th Annual Consumer Conference In Boston     6/21/2017   Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Rita Keskinyan As Head Of Consumer Banking     6/16/2017   Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering     6/16/2017   Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering     6/7/2017   Marshall A. Heinberg Named Chairman of Ecology and Environment, Inc.  Board of Directors    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Oppenheimer Holdings Inc., through its principal subsidiary, Oppenheimer & Co. Inc., is a United States regional broker-dealer. The Company offers a full range of services from various offices in the United States and international jurisdictions. Oppenheimer also offers online discount brokerage and dollar-based investing services.    Address  85 Broad StreetNew York, NY 10004United States   Phone  1-212-668-8000   Website   www.opco.com     Executives Board Members    Albert Grinsfelder Lowenthal "Bud"  Chairman/CEO    Jeffrey J Alfano  Chief Financial Officer    Bryan Edward McKigney  President:Oppenheimer Asset Mgmt INC.    Mark T Whaley  Exec VP:Private Cline Service    Rob Lowenthal  MD:Taxable Fixed Income Bus     Show More         


Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








OPY Stock Price - Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Cl A Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,773.40


62.39


0.29%











S&P 500

2,482.50


4.67


0.19%











Nasdaq

6,455.55


32.81


0.51%











GlobalDow

2,851.92


2.39


0.08%











Gold

1,263.20


7.60


0.61%











Oil

48.96


0.21


0.43%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



TSCO 
7.4




VZ 
6.8




KIM 
5.9




CHTR 
5.2






CA
-9.0




JCI
-8.4




WHR
-7.4




FFIV
-6.9














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








11:55a

Jeff Bezos is now the richest person in the world



11:52a

Charlize Theron is James Bond for the 21st century and that’s more important than you think



11:47a

Boeing shares get a price target upgrade from Canaccord



11:46a

Updated
Stock market sets another round of records  as Facebook rallies



11:40a

Updated
What Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss



11:39a

Updated
3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life



11:34a

Updated
Dow industrials tag technical target, S&P 500 crawls to latest record high



11:32a

Opinion
Brewing your own beer is a great investment in yourself



11:32a

Updated
These companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them



11:23a

The ‘lost generation’ has recovered on the jobs front, research finds












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


OPY


Overview



Compare Quotes
Market Screener
Sectors

 



OPY
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Cl A

Watchlist 
CreateOPYAlert



  


Open

Last Updated: Jul 27, 2017 11:39 a.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
16.60



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$16.6000





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




37.67% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    9.3K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 24.7K
            





Open: 16.70
Last: 16.60



16.4000
Day Low/High
16.7500





Day Range



13.6511
52 Week Low/High
19.6500


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$16.70



Day Range
16.4000 - 16.7500



52 Week Range
13.6511 - 19.6500



Market Cap
$220.43M



Shares Outstanding
13.18M



Public Float
9.23M



Beta
1.28



Rev. per Employee
$275.85K



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
$-0.15



Yield
2.65%



Dividend
$0.11



Ex-Dividend Date
May 10, 2017



Short Interest
122.62K
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
1.33%



Average Volume
24.7K




 


Performance




5 Day


2.15%







1 Month


0.30%







3 Month


-5.41%







YTD


-10.75%







1 Year


4.73%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










Oppenheimer board approves buyback of up to 650,000 shares
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.  said Friday its board has approved a share buyback of up to 650,000 of its Class A non-voting common stock. The new authorization adds to the 40,734 share that remain under a previous program. Shares of the middle-market investment bank were not yet active in premarket trade, but are down 10% in 2017, while the S&P 500  has gained 6.7%.

May. 5, 2017 at 8:05 a.m. ET
by Ciara Linnane









Oppenheimer board approves share buyback of up to 650K shares
Oppenheimer board approves share buyback of up to 650K shares

May. 5, 2017 at 8:02 a.m. ET
by Ciara Linnane









Producers win, refiners lose as U.S. crude-oil export ban dies


Jun. 25, 2014 at 11:54 a.m. ET
by Joseph Adinolfi









Oppenheimer fined $1.4 mln for oversight failure


Aug. 5, 2013 at 10:03 a.m. ET
by Ronald D. Orol









6 stocks to buy, 2 to sell by Goldman Sachs


Jan. 30, 2012 at 12:01 a.m. ET
by Meena Krishnamsetty









Stocks to watch Monday: Cephalon, AT&T


Oct. 10, 2011 at 6:37 a.m. ET
by MarketWatch









Temasek, Oppenheimer to invest $300 mln in Africa


Aug. 5, 2011 at 7:55 a.m. ET









Ashland sues Oppenheimer & Co. over auction rate securities


Apr. 17, 2009 at 8:38 a.m. ET
by Sam Mamudi









Oppenheimer Holdings to move to U.S. from Canada


Mar. 11, 2009 at 8:39 a.m. ET
by John Ittner









Oppenheimer Holdings to move to U.S. from Canada


Mar. 11, 2009 at 8:33 a.m. ET
by John Ittner









CORRECT: Mass. charges Oppenheimer & Co. over ARS sales


Nov. 18, 2008 at 1:31 p.m. ET
by Wallace Witkowski









CORRECT: Mass. charges Oppenheimer & Co. over ARS sales


Nov. 18, 2008 at 1:30 p.m. ET
by Wallace Witkowski









'Low-hurdle' stocks offer high profit potential


Jun. 17, 2008 at 4:16 p.m. ET
by MarketWatch









'Be long where the market is setting the hurdle very low'


Jun. 17, 2008 at 7:54 a.m. ET
by Chuck Jaffe









CIBC to sell some businesses to Oppenheimer Holdings


Nov. 5, 2007 at 4:44 a.m. ET
by Robert Daniel









Updates, advisories and surprises


Jan. 26, 2007 at 5:31 p.m. ET
by MarketWatch









Oppenheimer net income rises 36%


Jan. 26, 2007 at 8:32 a.m. ET
by Steve Gelsi










Breaking            
Oppenheimer Holdings Q4 earnings 80c vs 44c


Jan. 26, 2007 at 8:23 a.m. ET
by Thomas Middleton










Breaking            
Oppenheimer Holdings Q4 revenue $218.3M vs $185.3M


Jan. 26, 2007 at 8:23 a.m. ET
by Thomas Middleton









NASD fines Oppenheimer & Co. in complaint settlement


Oct. 4, 2006 at 10:57 a.m. ET
by John Spence














U.S. Government Bonds Fall as Hillary Clinton Leads in Early Results

Nov. 8, 2016 at 4:42 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Tesla Generates a Profit

Oct. 26, 2016 at 8:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Tesla to Partner with Panasonic to Make Solar Panels at Buffalo Factory

Oct. 17, 2016 at 6:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Supreme Court Strikes Down Puerto Rico Debt-Restructuring Law

Jun. 13, 2016 at 2:41 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal











Puerto Rico Debt: What Investors Need to Know

Jun. 29, 2015 at 2:43 p.m. ET
on Barron's









Auction-Rate Securities: Still Frozen in Time


Mar. 28, 2015 at 12:41 a.m. ET
on Barron's










Will Cheap Oil Lead to Big Mergers?

Dec. 5, 2014 at 3:38 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Playing the Emerging Markets


Apr. 15, 2014 at 9:51 p.m. ET
on Dowjones.com










Occidental Re-Evaluates Its Role in Commodities Trading

Feb. 14, 2014 at 7:26 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









SEC bars former Oppenheimer manager for allegedly misleading investors


Jan. 22, 2014 at 2:43 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









In Case You Missed It…


Aug. 23, 2013 at 3:04 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









SEC Charges Former Oppenheimer Manager With Misleading Investors


Aug. 20, 2013 at 3:44 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Venezuela Raids Local Brokerage Linked to Oppenheimer


Apr. 5, 2013 at 5:17 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Stocks to Watch: Suntech, Entropic, SuperMedia


Mar. 18, 2013 at 9:16 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Oppenheimer & Co. to Pay Fine Over Fund


Mar. 11, 2013 at 7:13 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









As Some Banks Cut Back in Asia, Others Expand


Nov. 20, 2012 at 10:56 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Comp Ratios at I-Banks: How Goldman Stacks Up to Boutiques


Mar. 27, 2012 at 3:45 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










For Many Auction-Rate Investors, the Freeze Goes On

Mar. 13, 2012 at 5:18 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









U.S. Probes Fund Operated by Oppenheimer


Mar. 13, 2012 at 2:15 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Private-Equity Fund in Valuation Inquiry

Feb. 23, 2012 at 9:00 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Why TherapeuticsMD Inc Is Soaring Today


Jul. 11, 2017 at 11:14 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





Why Wayfair Jumped 22% in June 


Jul. 11, 2017 at 9:43 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 16, 2017 at 10:37 a.m. ET
on CNW Group





Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 6, 2017 at 11:25 a.m. ET
on CNW Group





Amazon.com, Inc. Stock (AMZN) Price Target Boosted Over $1,000…Again
Amazon.com, Inc. Stock (AMZN) Price Target Boosted Over $1,000…Again

May. 16, 2017 at 10:31 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program

May. 5, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on CNW Group





10-Q: OPPENHEIMER HOLDINGS INC


Apr. 28, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Best HSAs Offer Low Fees, Many Investment Options And Flexible Management


Mar. 20, 2017 at 7:48 a.m. ET
on Investors Business Daily





10-K: OPPENHEIMER HOLDINGS INC


Mar. 3, 2017 at 9:13 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Outfitter Advisors, Ltd. Buys CME Group, Heineken NV, Navient, Sells T. ...


Feb. 2, 2017 at 5:38 p.m. ET
on GuruFocus.com





10 Capital Markets Stocks to Sell Now


Dec. 21, 2016 at 9:15 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Biggest Movers in Financial Stocks Now – PFBX CLDC OCN WAC


Nov. 30, 2016 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – AAMC CISG UNH MSL


Nov. 29, 2016 at 10:15 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





U.S. Government Bonds Fall as Hillary Clinton Leads in Early Results

Nov. 8, 2016 at 4:42 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – HIIQ PLBC FXCM MARA


Oct. 28, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: OPPENHEIMER HOLDINGS INC


Oct. 28, 2016 at 9:29 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Tesla Generates a Profit

Oct. 26, 2016 at 8:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal





Tesla to Partner with Panasonic to Make Solar Panels at Buffalo Factory

Oct. 17, 2016 at 6:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal





12 Capital Markets Stocks to Sell Now


Sep. 28, 2016 at 8:45 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Here’s Why Twitter Inc’s PT Got Raised (TWTR)


Sep. 28, 2016 at 6:05 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com









Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Strengthens Equities Institutional Sales Division with New Senior Institutional Salesperson
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Strengthens Equities Institutional Sales Division with New Senior Institutional Salesperson

Jul. 10, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Four New Managing Directors In Its Fixed Income Business
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Four New Managing Directors In Its Fixed Income Business

Jun. 29, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Adds Two Managing Directors in Key Growth Markets
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Adds Two Managing Directors in Key Growth Markets

Jun. 28, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Completes 17th Annual Consumer Conference In Boston
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Completes 17th Annual Consumer Conference In Boston

Jun. 22, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Rita Keskinyan As Head Of Consumer Banking
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Rita Keskinyan As Head Of Consumer Banking

Jun. 21, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 16, 2017 at 10:37 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 6, 2017 at 11:25 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces the Start of the 2017 Summer Internship Program
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces the Start of the 2017 Summer Internship Program

Jun. 5, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Concludes Its Twelfth Industrial Growth Conference In New York
Oppenheimer Concludes Its Twelfth Industrial Growth Conference In New York

May. 11, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program

May. 5, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. announces Robin Graham as Head of Technology, Media & Communications Investment Banking
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. announces Robin Graham as Head of Technology, Media & Communications Investment Banking

May. 1, 2017 at 5:00 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Reports First Quarter 2017 Earnings and Announces Quarterly Dividend


Apr. 28, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Concludes Its Twenty-Seventh Healthcare Consumer Conference In New York City


Mar. 23, 2017 at 10:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Expands Its Healthcare Investment Banking by Adding a Leading Life Sciences Team


Mar. 20, 2017 at 9:53 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Call of $30 million of 8.75% Senior Secured Notes Due 2018


Mar. 15, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Reports Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2016 Earnings and Announces Quarterly Dividend


Jan. 27, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Reports Third Quarter 2016 Earnings and Announces Quarterly Dividend


Oct. 28, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Eight Oppenheimer Research Analysts Named To TipRanks' Top 25 Wall Street Analysts List


Sep. 29, 2016 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Hosts Inaugural Drone Day To Showcase New Technologies


Sep. 21, 2016 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Concludes Its Nineteenth Annual Technology, Internet & Communications Conference


Aug. 12, 2016 at 5:09 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF











Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Cl A


            
            Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. engages in the provision of financial services. It operates through the following segments: Private Client, Asset Management, Capital Markets, Commercial Mortgage Banking, and Corporate/Other. The Private Client segment includes net interest earning on client margin loans and cash balances, money market funds, and stock loan activities. The Asset Management segment consists of investment and fund management services. The Capital Markets segment offers investment banking, fixed income, public finance, and municipal trading. The Commercial Mortgage Banking segment provides financing and loan services. The Corporate/Other segment pertains to legal, compliance, accounting, and internal audit activities. The company was founded on May 11, 2005 and is headquartered in New York, NY.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  




Analyst Ratings



Sell
Under
Hold
Over
Buy

Number of Ratings 1
Full Ratings 





In Case You Didn't Know, Oppenheimer Is Publicly-Traded (And Its Valuation Is Attractive)


Sep. 14, 2015 at 10:47 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





Benzinga's Top Upgrades


Sep. 14, 2015 at 9:26 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




Stifel Financial Corp.
0.12%
$3.4B


Ladenburg Thalmann Financial Services Inc.
1.29%
$454.45M


Piper Jaffray Cos.
1.09%
$966.34M


Cowen Inc. Cl A
1.23%
$443.82M




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

4.62%








AMZN

2.55%








TWTR

-13.13%








BZUN

4.54%








CLF

-7.37%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.













Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




11:58 AM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:56aJeff Bezos is now the richest person in the world
11:52aCharlize Theron is James Bond for the 21st century and that’s more important than you think
11:47aBoeing shares get a price target upgrade from Canaccord
11:47aStock market sets another round of records  as Facebook rallies
11:40aWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
11:39a3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
11:35aDow industrials tag technical target, S&P 500 crawls to latest record high
11:33aBrewing your own beer is a great investment in yourself
11:33aThese companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
11:23aThe ‘lost generation’ has recovered on the jobs front, research finds
11:20aComcast is trying to win over millennials with new streaming service
11:20aBullish analyst says Netflix could reach $30 EPS over time
11:15aTreasury yields rebound on raft of solid economic data
11:05aWhirlpool shares slide 7% after profit miss, soft guidance
11:03aEx-Obama official pours cold water on Trump’s corporate tax cut target 
10:59aBREAKINGWhite House, lawmakers to issue tax-reform 'guiding principles' Thursday: Pence
10:55aInventories surge in June as trade deficit narrows
10:53aHillary Clinton’s new book ‘What Happened’ makes for hilarious R-rated internet 
10:50aGold flirts with highest level in 6-weeks 
10:50aHere’s what it looks like when the foreclosure ‘pig’ moves through the housing-crisis ‘python’
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,773.01

+62.00
+0.29%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,455.35

+32.61
+0.51%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,482.44

+4.61
+0.19%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Browse Stocks
Stocks A-Z


0-9ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZOther

Browse by Location

Argentina
Australia
Austria
Bahamas
Bahrain
Belgium
Bermuda
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
China
Colombia
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Egypt
Estonia
Finland
France
Germany
Gibraltar
Greece
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kuwait
Latvia
Lebanon
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Malaysia
Malta
Mauritius
Mexico
Monaco
Money Rates
Morocco
Namibia
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Panama
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Qatar
Romania
Russia
Saudi Arabia
Singapore
Slovakia
Slovenia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sweden
Switzerland
Taiwan
Thailand
Tunisia
Turkey
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United States
Venezuela
Western Samoa












Log In




11:58 AM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:56aJeff Bezos is now the richest person in the world
11:52aCharlize Theron is James Bond for the 21st century and that’s more important than you think
11:47aBoeing shares get a price target upgrade from Canaccord
11:47aStock market sets another round of records  as Facebook rallies
11:40aWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
11:39a3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
11:35aDow industrials tag technical target, S&P 500 crawls to latest record high
11:33aBrewing your own beer is a great investment in yourself
11:33aThese companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
11:23aThe ‘lost generation’ has recovered on the jobs front, research finds
11:20aComcast is trying to win over millennials with new streaming service
11:20aBullish analyst says Netflix could reach $30 EPS over time
11:15aTreasury yields rebound on raft of solid economic data
11:05aWhirlpool shares slide 7% after profit miss, soft guidance
11:03aEx-Obama official pours cold water on Trump’s corporate tax cut target 
10:59aBREAKINGWhite House, lawmakers to issue tax-reform 'guiding principles' Thursday: Pence
10:55aInventories surge in June as trade deficit narrows
10:53aHillary Clinton’s new book ‘What Happened’ makes for hilarious R-rated internet 
10:50aGold flirts with highest level in 6-weeks 
10:50aHere’s what it looks like when the foreclosure ‘pig’ moves through the housing-crisis ‘python’
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,773.20

+62.19
+0.29%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,455.55

+32.81
+0.51%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,482.48

+4.65
+0.19%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15



















































Stocks/Country/United States Index - Markets Index
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers
















Stocks
Rates
Funds
Bonds
Benchmarks
Real Estate Investment Trusts
Futures
American Depository Receipt Stocks
Exchange Traded Notes
Warrants
Indexes
Exchange Traded Funds
Currencies
Crypto Currencies

Location: United States



Name
Exchange
Sector




01 Communique Laboratory Inc. (OCQLF)
OOTC
Software


1347 Property Insurance Holdings Inc. (PIH)
XNAS
Non-Life Insurance


1-800-FLOWERS.COM Inc. Cl A (FLWS)
XNAS
Specialty Retail


1pm Industries Inc. (OPMZ)
OOTC
Food Products


1st Capital Bank (CA) (FISB)
OOTC
Banking


1st Constitution Bancorp (FCCY)
XNAS
Banking


1st NRG Corp. (FNRC)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


1st Source Corp. (SRCE)
XNAS
Banking


2050 Motors Inc. (ETFM)
OOTC
Automobiles


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl A (FOXA)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21st Century Fox Inc. Cl B (FOX)
XNAS
Broadcasting


21Vianet Group Inc. ADR (VNET)
XNAS
Internet/Online


22nd Century Group Inc. (XXII)
XASE
Biotechnology


24/7 Kid Doc Inc. (TVMD)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


2U Inc. (TWOU)
XNAS
Software


2xLeveraged Long E-TRACS Linked to Wells Fargo Business Development Co. Index 052441 (BDCL)
ARCX
Major International Banks


2xLeveraged Long ETRACS Wells Fargo Business Development (LBDC)
ARCX
Major International Banks


3D Eye Solutions Inc. (TDEY)
OOTC
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


3D Pioneer Systems Inc. (DPSM)
OOTC
Software


3D Systems Corp. (DDD)
XNYS
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3DIcon Corp. (TDCP)
OOTC
Software


3Dshopping.com (THDS)
OOTC
Mixed Retailing


3DX Industries Inc. (DDDX)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


3i Group PLC ADR (TGOPY)
OOTC
Finance Companies


3M Co. (MMM)
XNYS
Diversified Holding Companies


3Pea International Inc. (TPNL)
XOTC
Accounting


3Power Energy Group Inc. (PSPW)
OOTC
Renewable Energy Generation


3TL Technologies Corp. (TTMZF)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


420 Property Management Inc. (FTPM)
OOTC
Real Estate Agents/Brokers


4Cable TV International Inc. (CATV)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


4Licensing Corp. (FOURQ)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


500.com Ltd. ADR (WBAI)
XNYS
Gambling Industries


51job Inc. ADR (JOBS)
XNAS
Employment/Training Services


58.com Inc. ADR (WUBA)
XNYS
Consumer Services


5Barz International Inc. (BARZ)
OOTC
Networking


5N Plus Inc. (FPLSF)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


6D Global Technologies Inc. (SIXD)
OOTC
Computer Services


808 Renewable Energy Corp. (RNWR)
OOTC
Multiutilities


88 Energy Ltd. ADR (TNGRY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


888 Holdings PLC (EIHDF)
OOTC
Gambling Industries


8Point3 Energy Partners LP (CAFD)
XNAS
Renewable Energy Generation


8X8 Inc. (EGHT)
XNAS
Wired Telecommunications Services


A Clean Slate Inc. (DRWN)
OOTC
Diversified Business Services


A&W Revenue Royalties Income Fund (AWRRF)
OOTC
Restaurants


A. H. Belo Corp. Series A (AHC)
XNYS
Publishing


A. Schulman Inc. (SHLM)
XNAS
Commodity Chemicals


A. Schulman Inc. 6% Pfd. (SLMNP)
OOTC
Commodity Chemicals


A.D. Makepeace Co. (MAKE)
OOTC
Farming


A.M. Castle & Co. (CAS)
XNYS
Wholesalers


A.O. Smith Corp. (AOS)
XNYS
Building Materials/Products


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S ADR (AMKBY)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series A (AMKAF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.P. Moeller-Maersk A/S Series B (AMKBF)
OOTC
Water Transport/Shipping


A.S. Roma S.p.A. (ASRAF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


A-1 Group Inc. (AWON)
OOTC
Tobacco


A10 Networks Inc. (ATEN)
XNYS
Computer Services


a2 Milk Co. Ltd. (ACOPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


AAC Holdings Inc. (AAC)
XNYS
Healthcare Provision


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. (AACAF)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAC Technologies Holdings Inc. ADR (AACAY)
OOTC
Industrial Electronics


AAON Inc. (AAON)
XNAS
Building Materials/Products


AAP Inc. (AAPJ)
OOTC
Food Products


AAR Corp. (AIR)
XNYS
Aerospace Products/Parts


Aaron's Inc. (AAN)
XNYS
Consumer Services


AB Science S.A. (ABSCF)
OOTC
Pharmaceuticals


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Biofuels Index Total Return (FUE)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB Svensk Exportkredit ELEMENTS linked to MLCX Grain Index Total Return (GRU)
ARCX
Finance Companies


AB&T Financial Corp. (ABTO)
OOTC
Banking


Abacus Mining & Exploration Corp. (ABCFF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abakan Inc. (ABKI)
OOTC
Industrial Products


Abattis Bioceuticals Corp. (ATTBF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abaxis Inc. (ABAX)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


ABB Ltd. (ABLZF)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABB Ltd. ADR (ABB)
XNYS
Industrial Machinery


Abbott Laboratories (ABT)
XNYS
Pharmaceuticals


AbbVie Inc. (ABBV)
XNYS
Biotechnology


Abby Inc. (ABBY)
OOTC
Oil Extraction


Abcam PLC (ABCZF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Abcam PLC ADR (ABCZY)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABCO Energy Inc. (ABCE)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


Abcourt Mines Inc. (ABMBF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aben Resources Ltd. (ABNAF)
OOTC
General Mining


Abengoa S.A. B (AGOAF)
OOTC
Construction


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. (ABEO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Abeona Therapeutics Inc. Wt (ABEOW)
XNAS



Abercrombie & Fitch Co. (ANF)
XNYS
Clothing Retail


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund Inc. (FAX)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Investment Co. Ltd. (ABAKF)
OOTC
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC (ABDNF)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Asset Management PLC ADR (ABDNY)
OOTC
Investment Advisors


Aberdeen Australia Equity Fund Inc. (IAF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Chile Fund Inc. (CH)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Emerging Markets Smaller Company Opportunities Fund Inc. (ABE)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Global Income Fund Inc. (FCO)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Greater China Fund Inc. (GCH)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Indonesia Fund Inc. (IF)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen International Inc. (AABVF)
OOTC
General Mining


Aberdeen Israel Fund Inc. (ISL)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Japan Equity Fund Inc. (JEQ)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Latin America Equity Fund Inc. (LAQ)
XASE
Closed-End Funds


Aberdeen Singapore Fund Inc. (SGF)
XNYS
Closed-End Funds


Abertis Infraestructuras S.A. ADR (ABRTY)
OOTC
Transportation Services


Ability Inc. (ABIL)
XNAS
Precision Products


Ability Inc. Wt (ABIWF)
OOTC



Abiomed Inc. (ABMD)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Abitibi Royalties Inc. (ATBYF)
OOTC
General Mining


Able Energy Inc. (ABLE)
OOTC
Gas Utilities


Ablynx N.V. (ABLYF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


ABM Industries Inc. (ABM)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Abraxas Petroleum Corp. (AXAS)
XNAS
Oil Extraction


Absecon Bancorp (ASCN)
OOTC
Banking


Absolute Health & Fitness Inc. (AHFI)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Absolute Software Corp. (ALSWF)
OOTC
Software


ABT Holdings Inc. (ABOT)
OOTC
Precious Metals


Abtech Holdings Inc. (ABHD)
OOTC
Industrial Machinery


ABV Consulting Inc. (ABVN)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


AC Immune S.A. (ACIU)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acacia Communications Inc. (ACIA)
XNAS
Networking


Acacia Diversified Holdings Inc. (ACCA)
OOTC
Specialty Retail


Acacia Mining PLC (ABGLF)
OOTC
Gold


Acacia Research Corp. - Acacia Technologies (ACTG)
XNAS
Diversified Business Services


Acadia Healthcare Co. Inc. (ACHC)
XNAS
Healthcare Provision


ACADIA Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACAD)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Acadia Realty Trust (AKR)
XNYS



Acadian Timber Corp. (ACAZF)
OOTC
Forestry & Wood Products


Acasti Pharma Inc. (ACST)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Accelera Innovations Inc. (ACNV)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accelerate Diagnostics Inc. (AXDX)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accelerize Inc. (ACLZ)
XOTC
Life Insurance


Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Accenture PLC Cl A (ACN)
XNYS
Diversified Business Services


Access National Corp. (ANCX)
XNAS
Banking


Access Power Inc. (ACCR)
OOTC
Wired Telecommunications Services


Access Worldwide Communications Inc. (AWWC)
OOTC
Advertising/Marketing/Public Relations


Acciona S.A. (ACXIF)
OOTC
Construction


ACCO Brands Corp. (ACCO)
XNYS
Nondurable Household Products


Accor S.A. (ACRFF)
OOTC
Hotels


Accor S.A. ADR (ACCYY)
OOTC
Hotels


Accordia Golf Co. Ltd. (ACGFF)
OOTC
Recreational Services


Accredited Mortgage Loan REIT Trust 9.75% Perp. Cum. Pfd. Series A (AHHAP)
OOTC
Mortgages


Accretive Health Inc. (ACHI)
OOTC
Healthcare Provision


Accuray Inc. (ARAY)
XNAS
Medical Equipment/Supplies


Accuride Corp. (ACW)
XNYS
Auto & Commercial Vehicle Parts


AcelRx Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACRX)
XNAS
Pharmaceuticals


Acer Inc. GDR Reg S (ACEYY)
OOTC
Computers/Consumer Electronics


Acerus Pharmaceuticals Corp. (TRLPF)
OOTC
Biotechnology


Aceto Corp. (ACET)
XNAS
Specialty Chemicals


Achaogen Inc. (AKAO)
XNAS
Biotechnology


Achillion Pharmaceuticals Inc. (ACHN)
XNAS
Biotechnology


ACI Worldwide Inc. (ACIW)
XNAS
Software



«1234567891011-2021-3031-4041-5051-6061-7071-8081-9091-94»










Log In




11:58 AM EDT
July 27, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:56aJeff Bezos is now the richest person in the world
11:52aCharlize Theron is James Bond for the 21st century and that’s more important than you think
11:47aBoeing shares get a price target upgrade from Canaccord
11:47aStock market sets another round of records  as Facebook rallies
11:40aWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
11:39a3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
11:35aDow industrials tag technical target, S&P 500 crawls to latest record high
11:33aBrewing your own beer is a great investment in yourself
11:33aThese companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them
11:23aThe ‘lost generation’ has recovered on the jobs front, research finds
11:20aComcast is trying to win over millennials with new streaming service
11:20aBullish analyst says Netflix could reach $30 EPS over time
11:15aTreasury yields rebound on raft of solid economic data
11:05aWhirlpool shares slide 7% after profit miss, soft guidance
11:03aEx-Obama official pours cold water on Trump’s corporate tax cut target 
10:59aBREAKINGWhite House, lawmakers to issue tax-reform 'guiding principles' Thursday: Pence
10:55aInventories surge in June as trade deficit narrows
10:53aHillary Clinton’s new book ‘What Happened’ makes for hilarious R-rated internet 
10:50aGold flirts with highest level in 6-weeks 
10:50aHere’s what it looks like when the foreclosure ‘pig’ moves through the housing-crisis ‘python’
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,773.44

+62.43
+0.29%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,455.53

+32.78
+0.51%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,482.48

+4.65
+0.19%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































OPY Stock Price - Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Cl A Stock Quote (U.S.: NYSE) - MarketWatch



























 














































 















Sections

Watchlist




























Signup
 • 
Login

Search







Bulletin











US
Europe
Asia
FX
Rates
Futures


Range


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
1Y
2Y











Dow

21,773.31


62.30


0.29%











S&P 500

2,482.45


4.62


0.19%











Nasdaq

6,455.49


32.74


0.51%











GlobalDow

2,851.85


2.32


0.08%











Gold

1,263.20


7.60


0.61%











Oil

48.96


0.21


0.43%

















S&P 500 Movers(%)



TSCO 
7.3




VZ 
6.8




KIM 
5.9




CHTR 
5.2






CA
-8.9




JCI
-8.4




WHR
-7.4




FFIV
-6.9














Latest NewsAll Times Eastern








11:55a

Jeff Bezos is now the richest person in the world



11:52a

Charlize Theron is James Bond for the 21st century and that’s more important than you think



11:47a

Boeing shares get a price target upgrade from Canaccord



11:46a

Updated
Stock market sets another round of records  as Facebook rallies



11:40a

Updated
What Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss



11:39a

Updated
3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life



11:34a

Updated
Dow industrials tag technical target, S&P 500 crawls to latest record high



11:32a

Opinion
Brewing your own beer is a great investment in yourself



11:32a

Updated
These companies spent over $1 billion buying back shares while their CEOs were dumping them



11:23a

The ‘lost generation’ has recovered on the jobs front, research finds












to be replaced

























































































































    




Home


Investing


Quotes


Stocks


United States


OPY


Overview



Compare Quotes
Market Screener
Sectors

 



OPY
U.S.: NYSE


Join TD Ameritrade

Find a Broker


Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Cl A

Watchlist 
CreateOPYAlert



  


Open

Last Updated: Jul 27, 2017 11:39 a.m. EDT
Delayed quote



$
16.60



0.00
0.00%






Previous Close




$16.6000





  









Advanced Charting


1D
5D
1M
3M
6M
YTD
1Y
3Y
All




$
%
Vol


Advanced Charting

  




37.67% vs Avg.




                Volume:               
                
                    9.3K
                


                65 Day Avg. - 24.7K
            





Open: 16.70
Last: 16.60



16.4000
Day Low/High
16.7500





Day Range



13.6511
52 Week Low/High
19.6500


   








Your Watchlist



Customize MarketWatch
Have Watchlists? Log in to see them here or sign up to get started.

Create Account

                    … or Log In

















Symbol
Last
Chg
Chg %

















No Items in Watchlist
There are currently no items in this Watchlist.

Add Ticker to Watchlist




 (Go to Your Watchlist) 




No Saved Watchlists
Create a list of the investments you want to track.

Create Watchlist

                    …or try this starter list






Uh oh
Something went wrong while loading Watchlist.

Go to Watchlist



 

Recently Viewed Tickers



No Recent Tickers
Visit a quote page and your recently viewed tickers will be displayed here.

Search Tickers



















   





Overview


Profile


News


Charts


Financials


Historical Quotes


Analyst Estimates


Options


SEC Filings


Insiders



   




Key Data



Open
$16.70



Day Range
16.4000 - 16.7500



52 Week Range
13.6511 - 19.6500



Market Cap
$220.43M



Shares Outstanding
13.18M



Public Float
9.23M



Beta
1.28



Rev. per Employee
$275.85K



P/E Ratio
n/a



EPS
$-0.15



Yield
2.65%



Dividend
$0.11



Ex-Dividend Date
May 10, 2017



Short Interest
122.62K
07/14/17


% of Float Shorted
1.33%



Average Volume
24.7K




 


Performance




5 Day


2.15%







1 Month


0.30%







3 Month


-5.41%







YTD


-10.75%







1 Year


4.73%









  

 
 


Recent News



MarketWatch
Other Dow Jones










Oppenheimer board approves buyback of up to 650,000 shares
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.  said Friday its board has approved a share buyback of up to 650,000 of its Class A non-voting common stock. The new authorization adds to the 40,734 share that remain under a previous program. Shares of the middle-market investment bank were not yet active in premarket trade, but are down 10% in 2017, while the S&P 500  has gained 6.7%.

May. 5, 2017 at 8:05 a.m. ET
by Ciara Linnane









Oppenheimer board approves share buyback of up to 650K shares
Oppenheimer board approves share buyback of up to 650K shares

May. 5, 2017 at 8:02 a.m. ET
by Ciara Linnane









Producers win, refiners lose as U.S. crude-oil export ban dies


Jun. 25, 2014 at 11:54 a.m. ET
by Joseph Adinolfi









Oppenheimer fined $1.4 mln for oversight failure


Aug. 5, 2013 at 10:03 a.m. ET
by Ronald D. Orol









6 stocks to buy, 2 to sell by Goldman Sachs


Jan. 30, 2012 at 12:01 a.m. ET
by Meena Krishnamsetty









Stocks to watch Monday: Cephalon, AT&T


Oct. 10, 2011 at 6:37 a.m. ET
by MarketWatch









Temasek, Oppenheimer to invest $300 mln in Africa


Aug. 5, 2011 at 7:55 a.m. ET









Ashland sues Oppenheimer & Co. over auction rate securities


Apr. 17, 2009 at 8:38 a.m. ET
by Sam Mamudi









Oppenheimer Holdings to move to U.S. from Canada


Mar. 11, 2009 at 8:39 a.m. ET
by John Ittner









Oppenheimer Holdings to move to U.S. from Canada


Mar. 11, 2009 at 8:33 a.m. ET
by John Ittner









CORRECT: Mass. charges Oppenheimer & Co. over ARS sales


Nov. 18, 2008 at 1:31 p.m. ET
by Wallace Witkowski









CORRECT: Mass. charges Oppenheimer & Co. over ARS sales


Nov. 18, 2008 at 1:30 p.m. ET
by Wallace Witkowski









'Low-hurdle' stocks offer high profit potential


Jun. 17, 2008 at 4:16 p.m. ET
by MarketWatch









'Be long where the market is setting the hurdle very low'


Jun. 17, 2008 at 7:54 a.m. ET
by Chuck Jaffe









CIBC to sell some businesses to Oppenheimer Holdings


Nov. 5, 2007 at 4:44 a.m. ET
by Robert Daniel









Updates, advisories and surprises


Jan. 26, 2007 at 5:31 p.m. ET
by MarketWatch









Oppenheimer net income rises 36%


Jan. 26, 2007 at 8:32 a.m. ET
by Steve Gelsi










Breaking            
Oppenheimer Holdings Q4 earnings 80c vs 44c


Jan. 26, 2007 at 8:23 a.m. ET
by Thomas Middleton










Breaking            
Oppenheimer Holdings Q4 revenue $218.3M vs $185.3M


Jan. 26, 2007 at 8:23 a.m. ET
by Thomas Middleton









NASD fines Oppenheimer & Co. in complaint settlement


Oct. 4, 2006 at 10:57 a.m. ET
by John Spence














U.S. Government Bonds Fall as Hillary Clinton Leads in Early Results

Nov. 8, 2016 at 4:42 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Tesla Generates a Profit

Oct. 26, 2016 at 8:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Tesla to Partner with Panasonic to Make Solar Panels at Buffalo Factory

Oct. 17, 2016 at 6:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Supreme Court Strikes Down Puerto Rico Debt-Restructuring Law

Jun. 13, 2016 at 2:41 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal











Puerto Rico Debt: What Investors Need to Know

Jun. 29, 2015 at 2:43 p.m. ET
on Barron's









Auction-Rate Securities: Still Frozen in Time


Mar. 28, 2015 at 12:41 a.m. ET
on Barron's










Will Cheap Oil Lead to Big Mergers?

Dec. 5, 2014 at 3:38 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Playing the Emerging Markets


Apr. 15, 2014 at 9:51 p.m. ET
on Dowjones.com










Occidental Re-Evaluates Its Role in Commodities Trading

Feb. 14, 2014 at 7:26 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









SEC bars former Oppenheimer manager for allegedly misleading investors


Jan. 22, 2014 at 2:43 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









In Case You Missed It…


Aug. 23, 2013 at 3:04 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









SEC Charges Former Oppenheimer Manager With Misleading Investors


Aug. 20, 2013 at 3:44 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Venezuela Raids Local Brokerage Linked to Oppenheimer


Apr. 5, 2013 at 5:17 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Stocks to Watch: Suntech, Entropic, SuperMedia


Mar. 18, 2013 at 9:16 a.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Oppenheimer & Co. to Pay Fine Over Fund


Mar. 11, 2013 at 7:13 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









As Some Banks Cut Back in Asia, Others Expand


Nov. 20, 2012 at 10:56 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









Comp Ratios at I-Banks: How Goldman Stacks Up to Boutiques


Mar. 27, 2012 at 3:45 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










For Many Auction-Rate Investors, the Freeze Goes On

Mar. 13, 2012 at 5:18 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal









U.S. Probes Fund Operated by Oppenheimer


Mar. 13, 2012 at 2:15 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal










Private-Equity Fund in Valuation Inquiry

Feb. 23, 2012 at 9:00 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal














Recent News



Other News
Press Releases






Why TherapeuticsMD Inc Is Soaring Today


Jul. 11, 2017 at 11:14 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





Why Wayfair Jumped 22% in June 


Jul. 11, 2017 at 9:43 a.m. ET
on Motley Fool





Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 16, 2017 at 10:37 a.m. ET
on CNW Group





Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 6, 2017 at 11:25 a.m. ET
on CNW Group





Amazon.com, Inc. Stock (AMZN) Price Target Boosted Over $1,000…Again
Amazon.com, Inc. Stock (AMZN) Price Target Boosted Over $1,000…Again

May. 16, 2017 at 10:31 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program

May. 5, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on CNW Group





10-Q: OPPENHEIMER HOLDINGS INC


Apr. 28, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Best HSAs Offer Low Fees, Many Investment Options And Flexible Management


Mar. 20, 2017 at 7:48 a.m. ET
on Investors Business Daily





10-K: OPPENHEIMER HOLDINGS INC


Mar. 3, 2017 at 9:13 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Outfitter Advisors, Ltd. Buys CME Group, Heineken NV, Navient, Sells T. ...


Feb. 2, 2017 at 5:38 p.m. ET
on GuruFocus.com





10 Capital Markets Stocks to Sell Now


Dec. 21, 2016 at 9:15 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Biggest Movers in Financial Stocks Now – PFBX CLDC OCN WAC


Nov. 30, 2016 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – AAMC CISG UNH MSL


Nov. 29, 2016 at 10:15 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





U.S. Government Bonds Fall as Hillary Clinton Leads in Early Results

Nov. 8, 2016 at 4:42 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal





Hottest Financial Stocks Now – HIIQ PLBC FXCM MARA


Oct. 28, 2016 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





10-Q: OPPENHEIMER HOLDINGS INC


Oct. 28, 2016 at 9:29 a.m. ET
on Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)





Tesla Generates a Profit

Oct. 26, 2016 at 8:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal





Tesla to Partner with Panasonic to Make Solar Panels at Buffalo Factory

Oct. 17, 2016 at 6:27 p.m. ET
on The Wall Street Journal





12 Capital Markets Stocks to Sell Now


Sep. 28, 2016 at 8:45 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com





Here’s Why Twitter Inc’s PT Got Raised (TWTR)


Sep. 28, 2016 at 6:05 a.m. ET
on InvestorPlace.com









Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Strengthens Equities Institutional Sales Division with New Senior Institutional Salesperson
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Strengthens Equities Institutional Sales Division with New Senior Institutional Salesperson

Jul. 10, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Four New Managing Directors In Its Fixed Income Business
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Four New Managing Directors In Its Fixed Income Business

Jun. 29, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Adds Two Managing Directors in Key Growth Markets
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Adds Two Managing Directors in Key Growth Markets

Jun. 28, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Completes 17th Annual Consumer Conference In Boston
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Completes 17th Annual Consumer Conference In Boston

Jun. 22, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Rita Keskinyan As Head Of Consumer Banking
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces Rita Keskinyan As Head Of Consumer Banking

Jun. 21, 2017 at 4:30 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Pricing of Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 16, 2017 at 10:37 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering
Oppenheimer Announces Proposed Senior Secured Notes Offering

Jun. 6, 2017 at 11:25 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces the Start of the 2017 Summer Internship Program
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Announces the Start of the 2017 Summer Internship Program

Jun. 5, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Concludes Its Twelfth Industrial Growth Conference In New York
Oppenheimer Concludes Its Twelfth Industrial Growth Conference In New York

May. 11, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program
Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Share Repurchase Program

May. 5, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. announces Robin Graham as Head of Technology, Media & Communications Investment Banking
Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. announces Robin Graham as Head of Technology, Media & Communications Investment Banking

May. 1, 2017 at 5:00 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Reports First Quarter 2017 Earnings and Announces Quarterly Dividend


Apr. 28, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Concludes Its Twenty-Seventh Healthcare Consumer Conference In New York City


Mar. 23, 2017 at 10:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. Expands Its Healthcare Investment Banking by Adding a Leading Life Sciences Team


Mar. 20, 2017 at 9:53 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Announces Call of $30 million of 8.75% Senior Secured Notes Due 2018


Mar. 15, 2017 at 9:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Reports Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2016 Earnings and Announces Quarterly Dividend


Jan. 27, 2017 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Reports Third Quarter 2016 Earnings and Announces Quarterly Dividend


Oct. 28, 2016 at 8:00 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Eight Oppenheimer Research Analysts Named To TipRanks' Top 25 Wall Street Analysts List


Sep. 29, 2016 at 10:30 a.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Hosts Inaugural Drone Day To Showcase New Technologies


Sep. 21, 2016 at 4:15 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF





Oppenheimer Concludes Its Nineteenth Annual Technology, Internet & Communications Conference


Aug. 12, 2016 at 5:09 p.m. ET
on PR Newswire - PRF











Oppenheimer Holdings Inc. Cl A


            
            Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. engages in the provision of financial services. It operates through the following segments: Private Client, Asset Management, Capital Markets, Commercial Mortgage Banking, and Corporate/Other. The Private Client segment includes net interest earning on client margin loans and cash balances, money market funds, and stock loan activities. The Asset Management segment consists of investment and fund management services. The Capital Markets segment offers investment banking, fixed income, public finance, and municipal trading. The Commercial Mortgage Banking segment provides financing and loan services. The Corporate/Other segment pertains to legal, compliance, accounting, and internal audit activities. The company was founded on May 11, 2005 and is headquartered in New York, NY.

            
            (See Full Profile)


  




Analyst Ratings



Sell
Under
Hold
Over
Buy

Number of Ratings 1
Full Ratings 





In Case You Didn't Know, Oppenheimer Is Publicly-Traded (And Its Valuation Is Attractive)


Sep. 14, 2015 at 10:47 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





Benzinga's Top Upgrades


Sep. 14, 2015 at 9:26 a.m. ET
on Benzinga.com





 


Competitors




Name
Chg %
Market Cap




Stifel Financial Corp.
0.12%
$3.4B


Ladenburg Thalmann Financial Services Inc.
1.29%
$454.45M


Piper Jaffray Cos.
1.09%
$966.34M


Cowen Inc. Cl A
1.23%
$443.82M




Competitor Data Provided By


   






   



























Partner Content























Trending Tickers
Powered by 





FB

4.61%








AMZN

2.55%








TWTR

-13.13%








BZUN

4.54%








CLF

-7.70%
























Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found





























Video Center










Learn more.Storyful, a division of News Corp, which owns MarketWatch, is a leading social media services company headquartered in Dublin, Ireland. Storyful combines world class journalism with industry-leading technology to discover, verify and acquire original content and provide the on-the-ground sources news and media organizations need to tell the stories that matter to their audience.











Oppenheimer Holdings Inc (OPY.P)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Oppenheimer Holdings Inc (OPY.P)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerFinancialsCorporate Financial Services












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				OPY.P on NYSE Arca


				16.70USD
26 Jul 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    --


					            (--)
					        






Prev Close

$16.70


Open

--




Day's High

--


Day's Low

--




Volume

--


Avg. Vol

2,197




52-wk High

$19.65


52-wk Low

$13.70












					Full Description



Oppenheimer Holdings Inc., incorporated on May 11, 2009, is a middle-market investment bank and service broker-dealer. The Company is engaged in a range of activities in the securities industry, including retail securities brokerage, institutional sales and trading, investment banking (both corporate and public finance), research, market-making, trust services, and investment advisory and asset management services. The Company's segments are Private Client, Asset Management, Capital Markets, Commercial Mortgage Banking and Corporate/Other. The Company's subsidiaries include Oppenheimer & Co. Inc. (Oppenheimer), Oppenheimer Asset Management (OAM), Freedom Investments, Inc. (Freedom), Oppenheimer Trust Company (Oppenheimer Trust), OPY Credit Corp. and Oppenheimer Multifamily Housing & Healthcare Finance, Inc. (OMHHF). The Company's international businesses are carried on through Oppenheimer Europe Ltd. (United Kingdom), Oppenheimer Investments Asia Ltd. (Hong Kong) and Oppenheimer Israel (OPCO) Ltd. (Israel).Private ClientThe Company's Private Client segment provides an array of financial services through a network of approximately 1,230 financial advisors in over 80 offices located throughout the United States. Clients include high-net-worth individuals and families, corporate executives, and small and mid-sized businesses. Clients may choose a range of ways to establish a relationship and conduct business, including brokerage accounts with transaction-based pricing and/or investment advisory accounts with asset-based fee pricing. The Company's Private Client services include Full-Service Brokerage, Wealth Planning and Margin Lending. Full-service brokerage covers an array of investment alternatives, including exchange-traded and over-the-counter corporate equity and debt securities, money market instruments, exchange-traded options and futures contracts, municipal bonds, mutual funds and unit investment trusts. Wealth planning services include asset management, individual and corporate retirement solutions, including insurance and annuity products, Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs) and 401(k) plans, the United States stock plan services to corporate executives and businesses, education savings programs, and trust and fiduciary services to individual and corporate clients. Margin Lending includes credit to its customers, collateralized by securities and cash in the customer's account, for a portion of the purchase price, and receives income from interest charged on such extensions of credit.Asset ManagementThe Company's Asset Management segment offers a range of investment advisory, portfolio management and financial planning services to its retail and institutional clients through third-party distribution channels. Clients include high-net-worth individuals and families, foundations and endowments, insurance companies, and trust and pension funds. Investment management capabilities include equity, fixed income, balanced and alternative investments, which are offered through vehicles, such as privately managed accounts, and retail and institutional separate accounts.The Company provides clients with over three wrap fee-based programs: Investment Advisory Services, through which clients may select among those managers approved by the Company; Strategic Asset Review, through which clients may select among those managers available, and Unified Managed Account, which allows multiple investment managers, mutual funds and exchange traded funds (ETFs) to be combined in a single custodial account. The Company offers a fee-based mutual fund program, Portfolio Advisory Services, where clients may choose long-term strategic asset allocation programs among mutual funds approved by the Company.Oppenheimer Investment Advisors offers internal portfolio managers servicing high-net-worth individuals, retirement plans, endowments, foundations and trusts using both taxable and non-taxable fixed income strategies. Through its Omega and Fahnestock Asset Management programs, the Company offers discretionary fee-based investment programs managed by Oppenheimer advisors with a client-focused approach to money management, servicing high-net-worth individuals, families, endowments and foundations, and institutions. In addition, the Alpha programs offer similar services as a commission-based program. Under Oppenheimer's Preference Program, Oppenheimer provides non-discretionary investment advisory services to high-net-worth individuals and families who pay an advisory fee on a quarterly basis. The program includes features, such as initial portfolio consultation, quarterly performance reporting and periodic consultation. Oppenheimer Investment Management, LLC (OIM) provides fixed income management and solutions to institutional investors, including Taft-Hartley funds, public pension funds, corporate pension funds, insurance companies, and foundations and endowments. The Company also offers high-net-worth and institutional investors the opportunity to participate in a range of non-traditional investment strategies. Strategies include single manager hedge funds, fund of funds and private equity vehicles.Capital MarketsThe Company's Capital Markets segment includes investment banking, institutional equities sales, trading, and research, taxable fixed income sales, trading, and research, public finance and municipal trading, as well as the Company's operations in the United Kingdom, Hong Kong and Israel. Oppenheimer's investment banking division provides advisory services and capital markets products to emerging growth and middle market businesses. The Company also advises buyers and sellers on sales, divestitures, mergers, acquisitions, tender offers, privatizations, restructurings, spin-offs and joint ventures. Oppenheimer provides capital raising solutions for corporate clients through initial public offerings, follow-on offerings, equity-linked offerings, private investments in public entities, and private placements. The Company offers a range of debt financing for emerging growth and middle market companies and financial sponsors.Commercial Mortgage BankingThrough OMHHF, the Company is engaged in the business of originating and servicing Federal Housing Administration (FHA) insured multifamily and healthcare facility loans and securitizing these loans into Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA) mortgage-backed securities. OMHHF also offers mortgage services to developers of commercial properties, including apartments, elderly housing and nursing homes that satisfy FHA criteria. OMHHF maintains a mortgage servicing portfolio for, which it provides an array of services, including the collection of mortgage payments from mortgagors, which are passed on to the mortgage holders, construction loan management and asset management.

» Full Overview of OPY.P







					Company Address



Oppenheimer Holdings Inc
85 Broad St Fl 22NEW YORK   NY   10004-2434
P: +1212.8254331F: +1302.6365454







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 Albert Lowenthal

3,956,070




							 Jeffrey Alfano

1,070,010




							 Kenneth McArthur

--




							 Paul Friedman

--




							 Robert Lowenthal

326,764




» More Officers & Directors





					Oppenheimer Holdings Inc News




BRIEF-OPPENHEIMER ANNOUNCES PRICING OF SENIOR SECURED NOTES OFFERING

Jun 16 2017 
BRIEF-Oppenheimer Holdings announces proposed senior secured notes offering

Jun 06 2017 
BRIEF-Oppenheimer Holdings Inc announces share repurchase program

May 05 2017 
BRIEF-Oppenheimer Holdings Q1 adjusted earnings per share $0.99

Apr 28 2017 

» More OPY.P  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerFinancialsCorporate Financial Services






















Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.                                                                                                - Bloomsburg                                        , PA         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



PA



Bloomsburg



Security Brokers and Dealers



Stock Brokers And Dealers



                            Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.
                                    



 





















O 


Oppenheimer Holdings Inc.                                                                                               
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



136 W MAIN ST BLOOMSBURG, PA 17815
Get Directions



(570) 784-4210
 





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 1
 Industries Stock Brokers And Dealers
 Contacts  







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Additional information is available at                                                                                                          or by contacting                                                                                                                          at (570) 784-4210. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







O

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Financial Advisor Resources | OppenheimerFunds






































OppenheimerFunds.com

×





















Spoof Access

















Investor Admin


Advisor Admin




×






OppenheimerFunds.com




United States


Financial Advisor







Select Your Role


Individual Investor


Financial Advisor


Private Client Group


Registered Investment Advisor


Institutional Investor


OFI Retirement Plan Sponsors


Non-U.S. Resident Advisor



CHANGE LOCATION:



United States






Change Your Location




Ireland





Luxembourg





United Kingdom





United States






CHANGE ROLE





×









Oppenheimer Funds


















The Case for International Bonds
International bonds can offer favorable yields and valuations compared with U.S. bonds.







Select Login Type
Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
OFI Retirement Plan Sponsors

Enter User ID


User ID is required

Forgot User ID?


Enter Password


Password is required

Forgot Password?




Remember Me


Log in

Forgot
User ID
or Password? |
Register











News & Insights


















International Equities: Poised to Climb?


A new cycle of international equities outperforming U.S. stocks may have already begun.







View Article




















10 Things to Know About Emerging Market Stocks


We believe there are 10 factors warranting the rotation toward emerging market equities.







View Article




















What's to Worry About? These 3 Things


Despite a seemingly positive equity market outlook, reasons for worry persist.







View Article













Growth Opportunities in a Globalized World
















Searching for the Next Big Investment Idea


Why virtual reality, electric cars and healthcare have Portfolio Manager Frank Jennings’ attention.







View Article



















10 Reasons to Consider Investing in International Equities


Learn how your clients can benefit over the long term by investing internationally.







View Article






















The OppenheimerFunds Global Investing Handbook


Learn the potential benefits of global investing though our Global Handbook. 







View Article












Seeking Income in a Low Rate Environment 

















Complement Your Core with Senior Loans


Adding senior loans to fixed-income portfolios may produce higher yields with lower volatility.








View Article




















3 Potential Benefits of International Bonds


We believe income opportunities for investors may exist beyond the United States’ borders.







View Article












Keeping Clients Buckled In

















Growing Your Business Is an App Away


The CEO Advisor Institute app can help advisors grow and manage their business.







View Article



















Minding the Fiduciary Rule Gap


Our Client Engagement Toolkit helps advisors meet DOL Fiduciary Rule requirements.







View Article



















CEO Advisor Institute Podcast

Download these podcasts to help take your practice to the next level.



Explore












Professional Development







Investment Strategies for a Changing World




Markets may change, but we believe the Right Way to Invest remains constant.






International Growth Fund


Developing Markets Fund


SteelPath MLPs


Senior Floating Rate Fund


Revenue-Weighted ETFs





International Growth Fund
Developing Markets Fund
SteelPath MLPs
Senior Floating Rate Fund
Revenue-Weighted ETFs






International Growth Fund
While the world has changed drastically over the past two decades, Oppenheimer International Growth Fund’s investment philosophy has remained the same: invest in high-quality growth companies at attractive prices and holding them for the long term.


















George R. Evans


Chief Investment Officer, Equities, Portfolio Manager











Meet The Fund Manager


















The Reality of Investing in a Misunderstood Europe











Access Insights











International Equity
International Growth Fund
OIGAX
The Strategy typically invests in a mix of foreign growth stocks.


View More




Compare




Inception
3/96


NAV
$41.36

up
$0.46









Compare Funds





Developing Markets Fund
As China and the Emerging Markets (EM) begin to enter a cyclical recovery, the long-term view has come back into focus: the Emerging Markets are and will continue to be the growth engine for the world. Learn more about the opportunities in EM equities. 


















Justin Leverenz


Director of Emerging Markets Equities, Portfolio Manager











Meet The Fund Manager


















Opportunities and Challenges in Emerging Market Equities











Access Insights











Emerging Markets Equity
Developing Markets Fund
ODMAX
The Strategy typically invests in emerging and developing market stocks. 


View More




Compare




Inception
11/96


NAV
$40.27

up
$0.18









Compare Funds





SteelPath MLP Mutual Funds
Investing for the long term, OFI SteelPath MLP mutual funds are well-positioned to capitalize on current market conditions while seeking to limit risk. Learn more about how to access the fundamentals of the energy renaissance. 


















Brian Watson


Senior Portfolio Manager, Director of Research











Meet The Fund Manager


















July 2017 MLP Update: Market Update, SCOOP/STACK Education











Access Insights










OSPAX

SteelPath MLP Alpha Fund


4










OSPPX

SteelPath MLP Alpha Plus Fund


5










OSPMX

SteelPath MLP Income Fund


4









Compare Funds





Senior Floating Rate Fund
Finding income and avoiding principal losses in a rising rate environment can be challenging, but senior loans may help. Learn why we believe senior loans belong as a dedicated allocation in fixed income portfolios through any market environment.


















Joseph Welsh


Head of Senior Corporate Loan Team











Meet The Fund Manager










The Potential Advantages of Large Senior Loan Funds











Four Reasons to Avoid Passive Loan ETFs










Access Insights











Domestic Debt
Senior Floating Rate Fund
OOSAX
The Strategy typically invests in senior loans.


View More




Compare




Inception
9/99


NAV
$8.14


$0.00









Compare Funds





Revenue-Weighted ETFs
As Exchange Traded Funds (ETFs) gain popularity and evolve, Smart Beta strategies that do not weight indexes by market capitalization alone have emerged. Learn why a smart beta strategy weighted by revenue may offer a better way to gain broad exposure to markets. 


















The Smarter Way to Weight the Index











Learn More


















5 Reasons to Consider Revenue-Weighted ETFs











Access Insights










RWL

Large Cap Revenue ETF


7










RDIV

Ultra Dividend Revenue ETF


8










ESGL

ESG Revenue ETF


9


10









See All ETFs











1. 
Special Risks: Foreign investments may be volatile and involve additional expenses and special risks, including currency fluctuations, foreign taxes, regulatory and geopolitical risks. Emerging and developing market investments may be especially volatile. Eurozone investments may be subject to volatility and liquidity issues.  Investments in securities of growth companies may be volatile.  Mid-sized company stock is typically more volatile than that of larger company stock.  It may take a substantial period of time to realize a gain on an investment in a mid-sized company, if any gain is realized at all. Diversification does not guarantee profit or protect against loss.




2. 
As of 4/12/13, the purchase and exchange of Fund shares is restricted, subject to certain exceptions.  Please see the prospectus for further information.


3. 
Special Risks:  Foreign investments may be volatile and involve additional expenses and special risks, including currency fluctuations, foreign taxes, regulatory and geopolitical risks. Emerging and developing market investments may be especially volatile. Eurozone investments may be subject to volatility and liquidity issues.  Investments in securities of growth companies may be volatile.  Mid-sized company stock is typically more volatile than that of larger company stock.  It may take a substantial period of time to realize a gain on an investment in a mid-sized company, if any gain is realized at all. Investing significantly in a particular region, industry, sector or issuer may increase volatility and risk.



4. 
Special Risks: Investing in MLPs involves additional risks as compared to the risks of investing in common stock, including risks related to cash flow, dilution and voting rights. The Fund’s investments are concentrated in the energy infrastructure industry with an emphasis on securities issued by MLPs, which may increase volatility. Energy infrastructure companies are subject to risks specific to the industry such as fluctuations in commodity prices, reduced volumes of natural gas or other energy commodities, environmental hazards, changes in the macroeconomic or the regulatory environment or extreme weather. MLPs may trade less frequently than larger companies due to their smaller capitalizations which may result in erratic price movement or difficulty in buying or selling. Additional management fees and other expenses are associated with investing in MLP funds.

The Fund is subject to certain MLP tax risks. An investment in the Fund does not offer the same tax benefits of a direct investment in an MLP. The Fund is organized as a Subchapter “C” Corporation and is subject to U.S. federal income tax on taxable income at the corporate tax rate (currently as high as 35%) as well as state and local income taxes. The potential tax benefit of investing in MLPs depend on them being treated as partnerships for federal income tax purposes. If the MLP is deemed to be a corporation, its income would be subject to federal taxation at the entity level, reducing the amount of cash available for distribution which could result in a reduction of the fund’s value. MLP funds accrue deferred income taxes for future tax liabilities associated with the portion of MLP distributions considered to be a tax-deferred return of capital and for any net operating gains as well as capital appreciation of its investments. This deferred tax liability is reflected in the daily NAV and as a result a MLP fund's after-tax performance could differ significantly from the underlying assets even if the pre-tax performance is closely tracked.

The Fund is classified as a “non-diversified” fund and may invest a greater portion of its assets in the securities of a single issuer.


5. 
Special Risks: Investing in MLPs involves additional risks as compared to the risks of investing in common stock, including risks related to cash flow, dilution and voting rights. The Fund’s investments are concentrated in the energy infrastructure industry with an emphasis on securities issued by MLPs, which may increase volatility. Energy infrastructure companies are subject to risks specific to the industry such as fluctuations in commodity prices, reduced volumes of natural gas or other energy commodities, environmental hazards, changes in the macroeconomic or the regulatory environment or extreme weather. MLPs may trade less frequently than larger companies due to their smaller capitalizations which may result in erratic price movement or difficulty in buying or selling. Additional management fees and other expenses are associated with investing in MLP funds.

The Fund is subject to certain MLP tax risks. An investment in the Fund does not offer the same tax benefits of a direct investment in an MLP. The Fund is organized as a Subchapter “C” Corporation and is subject to U.S. federal income tax on taxable income at the corporate tax rate (currently as high as 35%) as well as state and local income taxes. The potential tax benefit of investing in MLPs depend on them being treated as partnerships for federal income tax purposes. If the MLP is deemed to be a corporation, its income would be subject to federal taxation at the entity level, reducing the amount of cash available for distribution which could result in a reduction of the fund’s value. MLP funds accrue deferred income taxes for future tax liabilities associated with the portion of MLP distributions considered to be a tax-deferred return of capital and for any net operating gains as well as capital appreciation of its investments. This deferred tax liability is reflected in the daily NAV and as a result a MLP fund's after-tax performance could differ significantly from the underlying assets even if the pre-tax performance is closely tracked.

The Fund is classified as a “non-diversified” fund and may invest a greater portion of its assets in the securities of a single issuer.

To the extent that a Fund obtains leverage through borrowings, there will be the potential for greater gains and the risk of magnified losses.


6. 
Special Risks: Senior loans are typically lower-rated and may be illiquid investments (which may not have a ready market).  The Fund may invest without limit in below-investment-grade securities.  The Fund may invest a variable amount in debt rated below "B." May invest 25% or more of its assets in securities issued by companies in the financial services sector which may be susceptible to economic and regulatory events, and increased volatility.   Foreign investments may be volatile and involve additional expenses and special risks, including currency fluctuations, foreign taxes, regulatory and geopolitical risks.  Fixed income investing entails credit and interest rate risks. When interest rates rise, bond prices generally fall, and the Fund’s share prices can fall. Derivative instruments entail higher volatility and risk of loss compared to traditional stock or bond investments. Leverage (borrowing) involves transaction and interest costs on amounts borrowed, which may reduce performance.


7. 
Special Risks: An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of principal amount invested. Fund returns may not match the return of its respective index, known as non-correlation risk, due to operating expenses incurred by the Fund. The alternate weighting approach employed by the Fund (i.e., using revenues as a weighting measure), while designed to enhance potential returns, may not produce the desired results. Because the Fund is rebalanced quarterly, portfolio turnover may exceed 100%. The greater the portfolio turnover, the greater the transaction costs, which could have an adverse effect on Fund performance.


8. 
Special Risks: An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of principal amount invested. There is no guarantee that the issuers of stocks will declare dividends in the future, or that dividends will remain at their current levels or increase over time. The Fund is classified as a “non-diversified” fund and may invest a greater portion of its assets in the securities of a single issuer. Investing significantly in a particular region, industry, sector or issuer may increase volatility and risk. Fund returns may not match the return of its respective index, known as non-correlation risk, due to operating expenses incurred by the Fund. The alternate weighting approach employed by the Fund (i.e., using revenues as a weighting measure), while designed to enhance potential returns, may not produce the desired results. Because the Fund is rebalanced quarterly, portfolio turnover may exceed 100%. The greater the portfolio turnover, the greater the transaction costs, which could have an adverse effect on Fund performance.


9. 
This is a new fund with a limited history and an inception date of 10/28/16.


10. 
Special Risks: An investment in the Fund is subject to investment risk, including the possible loss of principal amount invested. The stocks of companies with favorable ESG practices may underperform the stock market as a whole. Fund returns may not match the return of its respective index, known as non-correlation risk, due to operating expenses incurred by the Fund. The alternate weighting approach employed by the Fund (i.e., using revenues as a weighting measure), while designed to enhance potential returns, may not produce the desired results. Because the Fund is rebalanced quarterly, portfolio turnover may exceed 100%. The greater the portfolio turnover, the greater the transaction costs, which could have an adverse effect on Fund performance.


A. 
Daily net asset value and dollar change of the fund is as of the previous business day's closing. Fund net asset values are updated at approximately 7:00pm ET daily.
↩












You are leaving www.oppenheimerfunds.com and being redirected to a new site.


OppenheimerFunds, Inc. is not responsible for the content of any such site, and does not endorse or approve of that content.

Continue


×



Enlarged Image Modal


×









Loading...


Tiny Button
Small Button
Large Button
Default Button
Secondary Button
Framed Button
Framed Button ( Small Caps )













Welcome to Oppenheimer & Co. Inc.














































IN OUR VIEW FOR THE WEEK OF July 24, 2017





Investment Strategy "Give Me Money That’s What I Want"John Stoltzfus, Chief Investment Strategist
We quote the Beatles on the effects of currency trends on the performance of international assets.






Investor Update Newsletter   Read the latest edition of a free Oppenheimer newsletter made for you. It covers topics that are likely on your mind and it provides some useful tips. July 2017 Edition 










Oppenheimer can help you with your financial needs








Market Observations by Jeff Sutton








Conferences and Events 






















Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.

























Welcome to Oppenheimer & Co. Inc.














































IN OUR VIEW FOR THE WEEK OF July 24, 2017





Investment Strategy "Give Me Money That’s What I Want"John Stoltzfus, Chief Investment Strategist
We quote the Beatles on the effects of currency trends on the performance of international assets.






Investor Update Newsletter   Read the latest edition of a free Oppenheimer newsletter made for you. It covers topics that are likely on your mind and it provides some useful tips. July 2017 Edition 










Oppenheimer can help you with your financial needs








Market Observations by Jeff Sutton








Conferences and Events 






















Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 












Oppenheimer Holdings - Wikipedia





















 






Oppenheimer Holdings

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






This article relies too much on references to primary sources. Please improve this by adding secondary or tertiary sources. (July 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Oppenheimer Holdings





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: OPY


Industry
Financial Services


Founded
1881; 136 years ago (1881)


Founder
Harris C. Fahnestock


Headquarters
New York City, USA



Key people

Albert G. Lowenthal, Chairman


Products
Investment banking
Investment management
Wealth management


Revenue
 $1,019.7 million (2013)



Net income

 $25.1 million (2013)


AUM
 $25.3 billion (2013)



Number of employees

3500+


Website
www.opco.com


Oppenheimer Holdings is an investment bank and full-service investment firm offering investment banking, financial advisory services, capital markets services, asset management, wealth management, and related products and services worldwide. The company, which once occupied the One World Financial Center building in Manhattan, now bases its operations at 85 Broad Street and world headquarters at 125 Broad Street in New York City.[1]



Contents


1 History

1.1 CIBC Oppenheimer
1.2 Fahnestock Viner holdings
1.3 CIBC World Markets
1.4 Settlements with US regulators


2 Business groups
3 Major locations
4 Notable current and former equity research analysts

4.1 Business


5 See also
6 References
7 External links



History[edit]
Originally created as Oppenheimer & Company, Oppenheimer Holdings was founded in 1950 when a partnership was created to act as a broker-dealer and manage related financial services for large institutional clients.[2] While the 1960s and 1970s was a time of great prosperity for the company, origins of the firm trace back to 1881. After re-configuring operations in 1975, Oppenheimer & Co. formed three operating subsidiaries:

Oppenheimer & Co., Inc., a retail brokerage firm
Oppenheimer Capital Corporation, an institutional investment manager
Oppenheimer Management Corp. (subsequently spun off and now known as OppenheimerFunds, Inc. a subsidiary of MassMutual Financial Group)

In the 1980s, OpCo founding partners began looking for a buyer. Mercantile House Holdings, PLC, a publicly owned British corporation, made an offer in 1982, which was accepted and closed a year later. In 1986, a majority interest was bought in Oppenheimer & Co. and Oppenheimer Capital by the firm’s management, Chairman and CEO Stephen Robert and president Nathan Gantcher, along with a small group of their colleagues from Mercantile, for $150 million. A year later, British & Commonwealth Holdings, PLC, acquired Mercantile. The 1990s brought another separation of the original firm when Oppenheimer Capital's senior personnel acquired a majority interest in the subsidiary and separated from OpCo. In 1995, Robert and Gantcher, who controlled about 40 percent of OpCo's equity, became eager to locate additional capital to grow their firm. At first, OpCo explored options of forming a possible alliance with ING Groep NV that eventually fell through. Carrying on with this goal, management set out to merge with a bulge bracket bank that had access to the foreign markets.
Robert and Gantcher entertained offers from the second-largest private German financial institution and retail bank, Bayerische Vereinsbank. On Thursday, May 8, 1997, the Wall Street Journal announced that Pittsburgh-based PNC Bank Corp. was in talks to buy Oppenheimer & Co. for about $500 million in cash, stock, and options. The article's source warned that PNC and Oppenheimer hadn't arrived at a fixed price and that chatter could break the formal agreement, which was two weeks or more away. Analysts speculated that PNC would be paying too much for a brokerage house that no longer carried the brand recognition it once did in the securities industry. Only 13 days following the announcement, the Bloomberg News desk announced that for the third time in two years, OpCo had been abandoned by a prospective buyer. Two months later, it was announced that CIBC wanted to expand its brokerage business and was interested in the New York-based investment banking firm, which had annual revenues of $800 million and 680 brokers who sell stocks and bonds.
CIBC Oppenheimer[edit]
Nathan Gantcher, who joined Oppenheimer & Co. as a stockbroker in 1968, along with his partner Stephen Robert, who joined Oppenheimer Management, Inc. the same year as a portfolio manager, began talks with CIBC in July 1997. Fourth time being the charm, CIBC closed on Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. in November 1997, for $525 million and was paid over the next three years and included $175 million in order to retain the loyalty of key Oppenheimer executives who were not shareholders in the closely held private firm. The purchase was made through CIBC's existing US-based investment banking arm, CIBC Wood Gundy. However, with the deal having been closed, the firm's name was changed to CIBC Oppenheimer Holdings. CIBC Wood Gundy continued to act as the operating name in Canada, yet all European and Asian subsidiaries took the CIBC Oppenheimer name.
In 2003, CIBC made the decision to sell Oppenheimer’s retail brokerage business and name for $257 million to Fahnestock Viner Holdings, which subsequently changed its name to Oppenheimer. This separation was a sore wound among the institutional employees. Upon this sale, CIBC unified all CIBC Wood Gundy and CIBC Oppenheimer operations under the CIBC World Markets name.
Fahnestock Viner holdings[edit]
Fahnestock Viner traces its lineage back to Harris C. Fahnestock, an investment banker who was a founding member of one of Citigroup's predecessors, the First National Bank of New York. In 1881, Harris' son William formed his own investment bank at Two Wall Street, Fahnestock & Co., which expanded through the decades and was eventually acquired in 1988 by E.A. Viner Holdings, Ltd. The new company, Fahnestock Viner Holdings, would eventually change its name in 2003 upon the acquisition of CIBC Oppenheimer's retail brokerage business (the Private Client and U.S. Asset Management Divisions). Upon this acquisition, the new Oppenheimer & Co. would attempt to build an institutional division brandishing the once infamous Oppenheimer moniker. After several unsuccessful tries, Oppenheimer & Co. in late 2007 announced that they would be purchasing certain assets from CIBC World Markets.
CIBC World Markets[edit]
On November 4, 2007, CIBC announced from Toronto that they agreed to sell to Oppenheimer & Co. its U.S. domestic investment banking, equities, leveraged finance, and related debt capital markets businesses. The transaction also included CIBC's Israeli investment banking and equities business, and certain parts of other U.S. capital markets-related businesses located in the UK and Asia. The formal agreement dictated that Oppenheimer would borrow $100 million from CIBC in the form of a subordinated debt as well as a warehouse facility provided by the Canadian bank. The warehousing facility, initially up to $1.5 billion, would allow the newly formed Oppenheimer U.S. entity to finance and hold the syndicated loans for U.S. middle market companies. Underwriting of loans pursuant to the warehouse facility would be subject to joint credit approval by Oppenheimer and CIBC. In doing so, CIBC would benefit from the future success of Oppenheimer & Co. Some speculated that this sale was the result of the 2005 settlement of the civil lawsuits related to CIBC's entanglement with Enron for about $3 billion. It was one of the largest such settlements to date and believed to adversely affect CIBC operations. For many CIBC World Markets employees who remained from the original Oppenheimer & Co., the sale was reunification of sorts. The deal closed on January 14, 2008, yet both entities would share infrastructure for some time, and possibly office buildings. This included 300 Madison Avenue, the building once set out to be the New York, CIBC Center; however, it was sublet to PriceWaterhouseCoopers after a concern of having all employees under one roof following the 9/11 terrorist attacks and the sale of the U.S. retail brokerage division to Fahnestock.
Settlements with US regulators[edit]
In January 2015, Oppenheimer & Co. paid $20 million in civil settlements with U.S. regulators. [3]
In 1998, Dr. B. Johnson put $14,000 in stocks in an Oppenheimer account. Strictly under Oppenheimer management, nearly 20 years later in 2017, the account was worthless. Dr. Johnson cites mismanagement due to large maintenance fees and no maintenance. When closing the account to avoid fees charged on a worthless account, Dr. Johnson was sent forms after the fact to show that the account was being opened and that Oppenheimer had the power to manage the account.
Business groups[edit]

Wealth Management
Oppenheimer Asset Management
Oppenheimer Trust Company
Capital Markets

Major locations[edit]
United States

New York City
Atlanta
Boston
Denver
Houston
Los Angeles
San Francisco

International

London, United Kingdom
Toronto, Canada
Hong Kong, China SAR
Tel Aviv, Israel
Geneva, Switzerland

Notable current and former equity research analysts[edit]
Business[edit]

Henry Blodget - equity research analyst
Russ Dallen - Latin American research analyst [4][5]
Steve Eisman - equity research analyst
Leon Levy who co-founded the Oppenheimer mutual funds in 1959
Meredith Whitney - equity research analyst
Carter Braxton Worth - technical analyst

See also[edit]


Companies portal



CIBC World Markets
Wood Gundy Inc.

References[edit]

^ "Oppenheimer Holdings.". Craft. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer & Co. Background Information.". Shepherd Smith Edwards & Kantas. 2017. Retrieved May 15, 2017. 
^ "Oppenheimer paying $20M in settlements with US regulators". The Gazette. 27 January 2015. Retrieved 11 April 2016. 
^ "As others fled Venezuela, Stanford International saw a golden opportunity". The New York Times. 9 November 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 
^ "Scrutiny of Stanford's bank spreads to Caribbean". Reuters. 13 February 2009. Retrieved 15 September 2016. 

External links[edit]

Oppenheimer & Co Official Website
Oppenheimer Funds Official Website
CIBC sells Oppenheimer unit for $400 million







v
t
e


Investment banks




Bank



Divisions of
universal banks





Bulge bracket




Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Barclays
Citi Institutional Clients Group
Credit Suisse
Deutsche Bank Corporate and Investment Bank
J.P. Morgan & Co. (J.P. Morgan Cazenove)
UBS Investment Bank






Other




Berenberg Bank
BMO Capital Markets
BOC International
BNP Paribas Corporate & Institutional Banking
Brown Shipley
CIBC World Markets
CITIC Securities (CLSA)
Commerzbank Corporates & Markets
Crédit Agricole Corporate and Investment Bank
Daiwa Securities Capital Markets
EverBank World Markets
Harris Williams & Co.
HSBC Global Banking and Markets
ING Commercial Banking
Is Investment
KBC Bank
Korea Development Bank (Daewoo Securities)
Lloyds Bank Corporate Markets
Mitsubishi UFJ Securities
Mizuho Corporate Bank
Natixis
Nomura Securities
RBC Capital Markets
RBS Markets & International Banking
Sberbank CIB
Société Générale Corporate & Investment Bank
Standard Chartered
TD Securities
UniCredit Corporate & Investment Banking
VTB Capital
Wells Fargo Securities








Independents





Bulge bracket




Goldman Sachs
Morgan Stanley






Other




Allen & Company
Blackstone Group
Brewin Dolphin
BTG Pactual
Centerview Partners
China International Capital Corporation
Close Brothers Group
China Everbright Group

China Everbright Limited
Everbright Securities


Evercore Partners
FBR Capital Markets
Galaxy
Greenhill & Co.
Guosen Securities
Haitong Securities
Houlihan Lokey
Investec
Jefferies
Keefe, Bruyette & Woods
Lazard
Lincoln International
Macquarie Group
Mediobanca
Moelis & Company
N M Rothschild & Sons
Oppenheimer & Co.
Perella Weinberg Partners
Piper Jaffray
Raymond James Financial
Renaissance Capital
ROTH Capital Partners
Salam Investment Ltd.
Sandler O'Neill and Partners
Stifel Nicolaus
Stone Key Partners
William Blair & Company











 Category
 List










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Oppenheimer_Holdings&oldid=790967071"					
Categories: Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeBanks established in 1950Investment banksBanks based in New York CityFinancial services companies of the United StatesHidden categories: Articles lacking reliable references from July 2012All articles lacking reliable referencesPages using deprecated image syntax 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


日本語 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 07:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
